
                   Tests are straight forward and come directly from the lectures. Labs are very good.
                
                   The things on the tests are never what he's talked about or in the book. He gets off subject a lot and always talks way past when class should have been over.
                
                   Very boring course! Does give extra credit opportunities, probably only positive of the course.
                
                   DO NOT take his class. Lectures as if content is easy, so you think tests will be simple, but they're not. After a few days in the class you realize he's not talking about any content, but just trying to act like he knows what he's talking about. Always lectures after class is over. Tests are mostly written. He'll curve only if whole class bombed.
                
                   To make this simple; his study guides didn't help; his one final turned into two finals. I'd do the labs and somehow still get the lab quiz wrong. Sometimes results either weren't perfect (therefore wrong) or completely different (also wrong). Teacher never actually taught anything
                
                   Pretty cool prof. Meet deadlines and you should not have a problem getting an A in the class.
                
                   Worst class I have EVER taken. I'm an all A student and I got a C in this class. He gives study guides, but they don't do any good. Would NOT advise anyone to take this class
                
                   Class is pretty easy if you study for tests. Gives ALOT of extra credit opportunities.
                
                   You will have to take notes, especially on examples of each structure. The test I did the best on, was the one I read the textbook for.  It is pretty easy to zone out, I suggest colored pens. He is very kind and personable, but his quality of teaching does not match his very difficult tests,study hard and spend lots of time studying for practicals.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His reviews are nothing like his tests!!
                
                   She is very high energy and blunt -sometimes rude and pleasant simultaneously.  If I could change one thing about the course it would be quizzes.  They are nothing more than busy work and I find that frustrating.  At this point in college, if students procrastinate, that's up to them.  Know the course objectives and you'll be fine.
                
                   She's super smart and definitely lets you know that she's smarter than you. She is incredibly rude and even insults you with a smile. The class is very fast paced and you have to be able to keep up and always go to class. On a brighter note, I learned so many things in this class and the lab exercises are pretty cool. 
                
                   EXTREMELY lively and energetic. I found myself forgetting to breathe when she is really getting into lecture since she talks so fast and moves around so much and so quickly. She obviously likes the subjects she teaches. Her assignments and tests will make you think but she is not out to fail anyone and they are never overly difficult.
                
                   She is very smart graduated from John Hopkins. She teaches to you like you're all idiots compared to her. Focuses a lot on the chemistry aspect of it. Do the objectives and you'll do okay on the tests. You must study a lot for this class. Not an easy class. Try to take a different teacher if you can. You'll learn a lot,but she's super hard and rude
                
                   Very helpful class, it's fast paced but you will learn a lot. Lab assistance is a must. Complete the objectives and you'll be good for tests. Very interested in students, very open to help outside class, give review sessions, etc. Very straight forward, likes smart questions hates lazy students. She will help you if you help yourself.
                
                   Very energetic. Hard class but straightforward. Hands out notes- very helpful. Class is very interesting sometimes. Can be rude.
                
                   Fast paced. She over-emphasizes biochemistry aspects of this course.
                
                   she is very energetic but yet very rude. She hates when people will ask her questions, and she has no sympathy towards anyone no matter what
                
                   Very very very energitic woman.  She answered all emails in a very prompt mannar.  Teaching was a little fast pace, but very informative.  The class is made easy due to the outlines and objectives she hands out.
                
                   Very simple to pass class, watch online lectures from entertaining Dr. Wolf, and do online quiz. Very short amount of time on quizzes usually  minute a question and doesn't ask the normal expected questions so pay attention to lectures.  20% or so of this grade is based on lab grade, which is not difficult either. Just can't be lazy.
                
                   I have not needed Professor Binghams' help on anything so far, it's not a difficult class all you have to do is take quizzes weekly and exams from time to time. The one downside is the quizzes are open book but the time limit is extremely short, so if your computer freezes you are out of luck. 
                
                   It is an easy class. You should go to class, take good note, especially what he wrote, follow the study guide and you can get an A. The tests just have few questions with long time to do. Moreover, you do not need to buy textbook. You just need print all the outline and study it. The material is quite short. The lab is easy, too.
                
                   Take good notes should receive a A. Took this course during May intersession it was quick and easy. But lectures were long due to it being an intersession course. He does include some funny short stories that correlate with the course material.
                
                   If you show up to class and pay attention, you will get an A. His tests are easy if you follow his study guide. His accent can be hard to understand sometimes, but if you ask questions he will help you.
                
                   I had to drop his class because 1) it is extremly hard to understand his acent 2)he doesn't reply to any of his e-mails and is never in his office when he says that he will be there 3) when i asked for some help he just told me to re-read and just figure it out for myself.  Thankfully there is a cc nearby that i am going to take the class there.
                
                   One of the easiest professors had him for both intersessions (Bioinoformatics and Cytotechnology) tests are easy and only trouble would probably be to understand him, but if u need a 4 thousand level class this is one for u
                
                   Great professor. Very clear; great lectures. It doesn't hurt that she's pretty hot as well.
                
                   Dr. Gaasch completely covered every subject. This class was a breeze and I hate Biology.
                
                   Kaz is a genius. Well-rounded and delivers great courses. Content heavy but NOT difficult. Willing to help you 24/7. Teaches you to be a wildlife biologist. Very opinionated but teaches courses that help develop your own. Great scientist doing lots of research. Introverted but very nice. You want to take his classes. 100x better than Matlack.
                
                   Great professor, explains things well and multiple times so if you attend class and pay attention it is simple to learn the material. Can get dull sometimes, but if you put in effort and go to class you'll pass. Doesn't use a powerpoint to lecture
                
                   Best teacher ever. Hes so busy and teaches so many classes but still makes sure he has everything ready for next class. Hes late giving back tests sometimes, but you can always go in and ask for your grade. Literally the smartest teacher Ive ever had. Knows everything about everything. Incredibly nice and so so helpful. Will NEVER leave you hanging
                
                   Extremely knowledgable in MANY different fields, very technical, and won't ever give you incorrect answers. Teaches many interesting classes. Plant and vertebrate classes involve a lot of specimen identification and name memorization. Study hard. Essay question tests mostly. Keep your attendance up. Species accounts in Ichthyology and Herpetology.
                
                   Conservation Biology is really useful for knowing more about social issues associated with the environment. Kaz's tests are very long, thorough and require a lot of detailed knowledge to make an A. I think his tests are fabulous because he does not allow you to pass unless you show you understand. High standards!
                
                   I was one of the few people who really loved Plant Classification. It takes loads of extra time, and you can't just start on the project immediately because it takes a while to navigate the mass amounts of new vocabulary/how to use the key. Probably the best thing to do is to study the terms so that navigating the key isn't such a pain. The tests a
                
                   Everyone knows Dr. Kaz is knowledgable, but it comes at a price: he's exceedingly opinionated, and expresses his personal opinions as if they were hard-fast rules. A great guy to ask for help, just make sure you stroke his ego and don't question what he says. It might also be a good idea to develop your own opinions, and not take all he says in "discussions" (which seem to be stacked toward his views and against the students) as fact. Other than that, he's a good teacher, and I recommend him.
                
                   Best prof. he is a well of knowledge i have had many of his classes and have never been disappointed. btw take conservation bio, not required but learned more in that class than all 3 years in the program combined
                
                   Most knowledgeable professor I've ever had. He is a sponge for biological information, and you can ask him anything and get a clear answer. A bit shy at the beginning of all of his classes, but you will never have a professor you learn more from. The best.
                
                   Awesome! He really cares a lot about students and is willing to help you out anytime you need it.
                
                   Nice but really disorganized
                
                   Med Term used to be a joke, but Dr. Karaganis's course actually makes you learn.  Some people whined about it being tough, but they seemed to expect a free A in a 3000 level course.  Med Term is a good class and he's a good prof.  
                
                   crazy
                
                   I loved her!  Everyone thinks she's kinda crazy, but that's why I liked her so much.  She made class fun.  And the tests are pretty easy.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Her class is pretty easy, as long as you read the book. Pay attention to the drawings in the book, alot of the test is just labeling diagrams, which are easy to memorize. She is pretty entertaining at times, she makes off-the-wall comments and goes off on weird tangents.
                
                   A&P 2 - Has a very dry personality - but I loved him!  If you go to class (although not required) you will make an A easily in this class.  Alot of info to learn but he spells out what you need to know for tests! GREAT prof!
                
                   Dr. Lee is an AMAZING professor. He is very helpful & cares about your well being in the class. He gives you the powerpoint notes & explains them really well during lecture & he has great stories to tell. Test are intermediate. The lab is super easy & her method is as long as you show up to class & do the lab, you get 15 extra points to your grade.
                
                   Absolutely the best teacher I had at WTAMU.  Extremely smart and cares so much about each of his students.  Every student should take Dr. Lee's courses.  His lectures are very interesting and he gives the powerpoint notes to you.  Exams are easy and fair if you study and pay attention.  He's the best.
                
                   Voice record lectures and play them 3 times. No book, no quizzes, just tests. He is a complete prick, so ask other students for help, and watch your reiteration of what you learned, he contradicts other instructors especially about cholesterol medications.
                
                   He was my professor in graduate school at Texas Tech.  He was by far the best teacher I had during my stay.  Concise, to the point, extremely helpful and knowledgable.  For those of you who cry about &quot;earning&quot; your grade, get over it.  Welcome to the real world.  I am 11 yrs out now and it sickens we to see students complain about hard tests.
                
                   If you are an athlete I do not recommend taking his class. He teaches everything and more in the book and expects you too learn it all. When the tests come around he doesnt tell you anything but to read and listen to the notes. If you ask for help he will laugh at you so dont even bother. He most def. makes you work for the grade you get.
                
                   I worked very very hard and still didn't get the A I was aiming for. Anything that comes out of his mouth could be on the test; but, he doesn't tell you anything specific about them. Some are over only anatomy,some are just physiology;he doesn't ever say! I don't feel like my grade was a good representation of what I learned.
                
                   Take good notes and learn them inside and out.  His tests are fair, and right out of the notes.  Be sure to have great attendance or a friend to lend you the notes. There is a lot to learn, but none of it's hard, and he will explain things to students until they understand. Don't bother with the $5000 textbook, you never use it.
                
                   He runs a good class and leaves room for actual learning and using the information you learn in everyday situations. I love the class and have learned quite a bit.
                
                   Dr Latman is a good teacher.  He's funny and you can pick up on his humor if you have a dry sense of humor.  His test are right from the notes, although you do need to know your notes in and out.  His classes are fun and interesting.
                
                   Dr. Latman is an arrogant, rude man.  He does not deny this either. He creates an environment that is nonconducive to learning and even at times hostile.  He belittles and degrades students who are trying to learn and is a poor teacher. A monkey could stand up in class and teach Anatomy and perhaps that would be a better choice.
                
                   Love Dr. Matlack! I've had two of his classes. His lectures are entertaining, as well as informative and his class is structured in a manner that allows good discussion. Tests are directly from the lectures, which are easy to stay attentive during.
                
                   If you sit through one of his classes, you have sat through them all. He doesn't change lectures or tests year to year either, so nearly all the students have old tests and make an easy A that way. He is incredibly flaky and unreliable, just ask any grad student he has ever had. You're forced to take his classes for wildlife but don't learn much.
                
                   Dr. Matlack is actually a great professor and very helpful. 9 times out of 10 he will work with you if you need something. I've taken 4 of his classes now and all are are power point driven with the tests coming exactly from the notes so be prepared to take notes, know them, and don't miss class. 
                
                   Matlack provides no advising on what classes are needed to be a wildlife biologist, doesn't have office hours, can't keep graduate students around,  sleeps through or abandons students on his field trips (seriously), gives no career help. His classes are uninformative and repetitive. He's unreliable as a professor and mentor. 
                
                   Ray is a fun guy but a horrible professor. His classes do not prepare you to be a wildlife biologist, it's just memorizing the same basic information for every class. Don't let him help you with any research, he knows nothing about good experimental design and will likely flake out on you half way through. Don't be deceived by his charm.
                
                   If you like taking tons of notes, memorizing useless material, and having fill in the blank tests with no study guide, this class is for you. 
                
                   Useless prof if you want to be a wildlife biologist. Funny but knows nothing about ecology. Cancels class all the time, has grad students lecture for him, misses appointments, and several grads and undergrads have dropped him as an advisor. His classes are required so you can expect an easy A without learning a thing. Doesn't prep you for future.
                
                   Excellent professor with a great sense of humor.
                
                   Very nice guy who has lots of interesting stories to tell. The only thing I dislike is how he grades- EXTREMELY picky.
                
                   He is so fun and upbeat. Even though we have very different worldviews, he is a great teacher and I hope I can take more of his classes. his tests are fairly easy and the material is manageable. I suggest him to people who are willing to do some work, but not as much to people who love to be fiercely challenged, for them I suggest Kazmaier.
                
                   It was so fun despite it being early in the morning. He's very passionate and charismatic.
                
                   His 2 obsessions are powerpoint and bats. His lessons and seemingly his knowledge do not stray from what's on the powerpoint, even if you find something contradictory in the book. And he's a bat biologist, so every example he gives is related back to bats.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Nice teacher but you still need to pay attention and read ahead if you want an A or even B.
                
                   Ms. Meador is awesome. As long as she can tell you are trying and care about your grade she will work with you. She likes when students engage in her lectures and not just stare at her. Ask questions! Her tests are hard so you have to study!
                
                   I absolutely adore Ms. Meador. I've never had a class where there is as much give as there is take. You give effort, she gives effort. You care about your grade, she cares about your grade. Your well being is her well being. She has done more for me than just teach my NCSI class; she changed my life. I have great respect for this professor.
                
                   Boring! Horrible instructor.   Don't ask a question cause 8/10 times she'll make you feel dumb.  I do NOT recommend her. You have been warned.
                
                   WORST TEACHER IN THE WORLD> She will teach you nothing. I would rather be killed by Katniss in the hunger games before I take another one of her classes. She will break all ends of you and have you wishing you worked at Mcdonalds instead of going to school. GET OUT WHILE YOU CAN!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   Frustrated in this class. I attend class but she bores me so much I can't focus. There's material on the test that she doesn't teach us. Nothing is hands-on but she's supposed to help us develop a hands-on curriculum for students. There's no room for divergent thinking.
                
                   She's awesome!
                
                   Give her a chance and show interest... show up to class on time... study the notes and power point slides.  Take her for what she is and you'll do fine.
                
                   She can't teach worth anything. She makes you feel like an idiot when you ask questions. Not helpful at all when you go to her office outside of class for help.
                
                   She wasn't too bad for bio 101. I think I got a high B in the class. You just have to make sure to take notes and study. Actually it doesn't even matter anymore because she isn't around.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   OH MY GOSH!!! This class is HARD...and there is no exaggeration when I say that...if you are in for a REAL challenge, then Prof. Meador WILL make it for you...if you are a nursing major PLEASE, PLEASE, PLEEEEASE take Biol 210...you have been warned...
                
                   She was my lab teache for biology. Cool person. Didn't always explain things super well, but would answer any questions and helped with the experiments and such. Quizzes during every lab kind of sucked, but smart on her part. Overall, good class and teacher.
                
                   Dr. Ward is the sweetest! So helpful and caring, he wants the best for his students. Only had 3 exams, which are difficult if you don't read, study or attend the review sessions provided by SI. Gives pop quizzes that are easy 100's. Easy A-B if you study and attend review. Great professor! 
                
                   Lectures don't make hardly any sense.
                
                   Dr. Ward is interesting, funny, and a great professor. He seems genuinely interested in making sure his students understand the material.
                
                   Good geneticist, albeit old school, and can apply theory to real world. Have had several classes with him, all interesting and well delivered. Funny, genuine, helpful, intelligent. Good with grads and undergrads. Good wildlife research. WT needs more genetics classes!
                
                   Although attending lectures isn't mandatory, its highly recommended. His quizzes are NOT open book or notes, and he uses them as attendance. Being an AG major, I have not benefited from this course as I had hoped. Ag related content was summed up in one class period. He makes content difficult to understand.
                
                   Had him for Biol I, Genetics, and about to take for Molecular Cytogenetics. Clear on what's on the test, always willing to elaborate, GREAT with people. Always curves tests, tests always M/C. A warning for his higher level classes: his tests have gotten harder, utilize the tutors he recommends.
                
                   Great teacher! Very easy-going and funny. Lectures not mandatory, some classes are just spent watching videos. All power points are online. Occasional quizzes (easy, often open-book). Tests are easy with some studying. Honors section is easy as well. Definitely reccommen
                
                   Dr. Ward is laid back, kind, and generally awesome. Though he's a kick-ass conservation geneticist, he has a background in psychology, so he's very easy to talk with and relate to. He rocks! (had him for Conservation Genetics Special Topics course)
                
                   Great teacher! Gives curves
                
                   HE'S GREATTTT!!! he lectures most of the time and gives good notes. just read the notes and little bit from the textbook and you would get a 'B' in this class.
                
                   He was very easy. Tests came from the test bank most of the time. Attendance not really necessary because all slides are posted online. He goes over some things in class that aren't online but not enough to affect your test grade.
                
                   Dr. Aufderheide knows his stuff, he has been mastering Biology since before most of us were even born, that said he is a sweet old man so the lectures are hit or miss based on his energy level of the day. However, some of the material is impossible to be presented in an "energetic" manner, he does the best with what he can. Tests are reasonable.
                
                   Go to A+ and memorize the questions they give they are literally word for word the same as on the test, sometimes the answers are even in the same order. TAKE HIM..
                
                   His lectures are monotone, too focused on details, and jump around from topic to topic, making them very hard to follow and study based off of. Would NOT recommend and will not take him for any more classes
                
                   He is an awesome prof. He will explain in great detail if you need and he is pretty funny. I would take him again in a heartbeat. His tests are 40% short answer in 213 so you have to know the information well, but it is very doable. Highly recommend him!
                
                   I loved this class. Aufderheide is one of the best professors I've had. You need to understand the material and not just memorize it. An a is very possible with hard work!
                
                   He is a very funny, his lectures are not awesome. I learned a lot from his class. For exams, you really need to understand the materials in order to do me. Don't just memorize the book, it's useless!. Go to class, print out the slides, and take good notes.
                
                   I had him for Molec and Cell Bio. His exams are no JOKE, you MUST STUDY for this class. HIS exams are, however, VERY FAIR. and hes helpful in office hours. Aufderheide is a fair professor. You do the work, you get an A. You must study. Also, hustle around for old exams, you can find he pulls old multiple choice questions from them.  Good luck!
                
                   By far the best professor I have ever had in all 4 years of college! Super fun class and great guy. He brings in awesome species all the time and everything is really straightforward. I never thought I would like ecology but I LOVED it. I wish I could take it over again. Highly recommend!
                
                   Lectures are very interesting. Awesome professor, he is funny, shows videos and brings awesome species to class. Study the lecture notes carefully and do the practice exams and you will do great. Side note, I never thought I would ever enjoy an Ecology class but this class I did!
                
                   Tests are exactly what he teaches, no random crap. Knows what he's talking about, no text books. Would take again, interesting course. Drops lowest test score. Slide contain extra notes, so you wanna go to every class or atleast get the notes from someone.
                
                   Easy to understand, presents material well and in an organized way. He's funny and his lectures are interesting and contain videos. Minimal studying got me a B in the class because the tests are a bit tricky. Study well and you'll be fine.
                
                   Extra credit on some tests and all tests are lecture based. No real point in buying the textbook. Very fair class and going to the SI helps quite a bit. Quizzes every other day is probably the hardest part to prepare for them.
                
                   Bernardo tried way too hard to make an easy subject too challenging. He gave pop quizzes at random which add up to a test grade at the end so going to class is pretty important. His tests and quizzes are pretty unfair because they would emphasize a subject he had said maybe 1 word about in class, and the textbook hardly helped. I would not take him
                
                   Funny guy, really loves his subject (and his salamanders).  Gets off-topic in rambling stories leading to occasional frantic bursts of catch-up teaching.  Tests based 100% on lectures - no reading necessary.  His exams were all MC and decently easy.  Come to class, take notes, do the optional homework.
                
                   Buying the book is a waste. He will try to tell you that you need it, but you really don't. And I'm the kind of person who will read the entire book if needed. ITS NOT NEEDED. He doesn't always show up for his office hours. He's a really cool guy though and has a lot of experience in his field. Memorize the power points to do well on the tests.
                
                   Very interesting subject matter His tests are impossible. I had to work my butt off to make a B. He doesn't curve but has bonus questions on the tests. I think his problem is that he shares slightly different info in each section, and then puts ALL that info on the tests. So study with people in other sections if possible so you can compare notes. 
                
                   This class is tough. Not because of the material, but how the material is presented to you and how he makes his tests and quizzes (last minute?) so confusing and unrepresentative of the materials taught in class. There are lots of tests, and quizzes. You can do ok if you ditch that BS book, and take lots of notes in class. Also record if u can
                
                   Very good teacher! He really knows what he's talking about and you can tell he has much experience with what he's teaching. You must attend class!! You can definitely get a B and an A is definitely possible. He gives built in extra credit! You have to work for your grade! NO CURVE!
                
                   The class can be tough if you don't work for it, but he tells you how to make an A at the beginning of the semester.  Really funny guy.  He goes on lots of tangents, but they are helpful and slows down progress through the course material, making the workload lighter.
                
                   The class is intended to be more challenging and more focused on lecture than on an outline of the textbook. Quiz every week makes you responsible for always being on track and tests are moderately hard- study in advance! He has HW that is pretty much a guideline to the quizzes and tests. From what i hear, the book helps you get an A. Never used it
                
                   His exams came straight from his powerpoints and never from the book. Used the book as reference. He's good at explaining things, and he curved our last 2 individual exams, however, he did not curve the final grade. He always claimed he was willing to help you outside class, but he seemed to complain when I would show up at his office.
                
                   He can be a nice guy, but most of the time he is not. He doesn't explain material very well and most students complained every day about his class. Tests are nearly impossible to get an A. In my class, only 5% ended up getting A's and 20% got B's. The rest were mostly C's and D's. I really thought he would curve in the end, but he didn't.
                
                   Not very clear, rushes through lectures and has a very sarcastic attitude
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is kinda dorky. Do the homework promblems he gives you and you will have an easy A.
                
                   i can not stress enough that he makes biology very boring. a class you can easily fall asleep in, but that's necessarily a good thing. print off his notes and read the book. his test questions are a combo of the notes and reading the book. fun.
                
                   Everything on the test is in the notes. There's really no use in going to class, you'll fall asleep because he is so monotone. If you study the review, the test is super easy. I just finished taking one and i finished in 20 minutes. It's an easy class, just boring
                
                   goes throught the book i think, but can be very very monotonous at times. and he went to africa
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Get a different teacher if you can.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   lectures are pretty boring, and his test are dificult, everything on the test are on his notes.
                
                   Her lectures are pretty simple. She's easy to understand and knows what she is talking about. The issue is her tests. They are beyond hard. They're full of trick questions placed to purposely bring down her average. She doesn't care about her averages and usually doesn't curve.
                
                   Took her Bio1406 class at Blinn and made an A! I studied very hard for the tests, but overall the class was good. After the tests I would make an appointment with her and go over my tests and she would usually give me some points back, she also curves final grades at the end. I did not read the textbook except skimmed it before the tests.
                
                   I took her Biology 1406 at Blinn. She is a nice woman. She explains things in ways that are very understandable. Some times she says don't read the text book but really you just need to read what was covered in class. If she writes something on the board you should know it.
                
                   I took her at Blinn class 1406 and she was amazing! She took extra time to explain everything clearly and gave so many extra credit options! Never takes attendance maybe once or twice, if not many kids were in class she would take attendance and those kids would get extra credit! Only homework online and its 10% tests are very hard
                
                   I dont know if all the BIOL 112 lab professors are difficult but her lab quizzes are incredibly hard about 310% harder than anything in the lecture portion of the class
                
                   I had Chris Lee for Biol 112 and I loved it. He kept it interesting considering it was an 8am. Went to class everyday and a plus tutoring for tests and ended up with a B in the class. Test aren't to terrible, just study. Make sure you read the directions!!! The second test was the hardest for me. 
                
                   I was nervous coming into my 1st semester of college, but Lee was great at making the transition easy. Show up to class. He often gives bonus opportunities and gives questions that could possibly show up on the exams (& they usually do). You have to read the textbook cause he uses some info from it. The class requires effort, but an A is possible.
                
                   Dr. Lee was really hard. He says a lot of things in class that do not pertain to biology at all and it is very confusing. He spends too much time talking about the lab instead of lecture and that was really annoying. I feel like he purposely made this class hard out of his own enjoyment. DO NOT TAKE HIM. I REPEAT DO NOT TAKE HIM. 
                
                   If you actually want to learn biology, take Dr. Lee. His class is tough and he really makes you work for your grade. I went to every class and took notes thoroughly and he gives "possible" test questions in class and usually about 5 of them are on the test (he says to separate A from B students). He's hilarious and makes lectures fun - take him! 
                
                   This guy will marry you off with the textbook because OML his lectures are intense. But even with his in depth explanations he will still test you over small details in the book. He's funny and has character, really wants you to understand more than get good grades... So whichever matters more to you. Online quizzes with infinite tries for bonus
                
                   Suited to teach different learning types,  genuinely cares about his students grasping  the material,  he went the extra mile to give us links the resources like YouTube videos and other online materials, organized and user friendly course e campus page, study material all in one place. lighthearted nature, engaging lectures
                
                   I did not enjoy this class whatsoever. Lee was very vague about what he expected from his students and it was nearly impossible to pass.
                
                   Dr. Lee is the best teacher i've ever had. He is very tough and makes you work for an A but you will learn a lot and he is more then willing to help you. Wonderful, if you need bio and want an amazing professor but don't mind working for it pick Lee! 
                
                   Dr. Lee is probably one of the best professors I have had. He is a tough teacher but everyone can get through it you just have to be committed. I recommend him to anyone planning on taking Biol 111. He is truly amazing. 
                
                   He's a very good teacher. I would take another class from him. He explains things in different ways to help us understand. If you don't answer in class he will wait until you do, so don't be afraid to throw your thoughts out there.
                
                   Took him for Fall '14, had to drop. Never dropped any upper level courses before at A&M and I'm a junior.  Taught along side Gomer, who was worse than him. Wait until Spring to take this course, you should stay away from this duo unless you want to suffer. TAKE SOMEONE ELSE!! I don't know how else to say it, but I'll reiterate, DON'T TAKE HIM!
                
                   Tests are extremely hard and free response is usually 50-75 points of it. If you don't write exactly what he wants he won't give you credit. Super nice guy and willing to help if you go to office hours. Nice to look at as well. 
                
                   Tests are tough and you really have to know ALL the material. Studying amount reflected in your grade. Study learning objectives a lot before the test. Really know all material. Tests are part short answer, part MC. Tough material, but achievable. 
                
                   I didn't have the chance of selecting my professor for this class, and he was assigned to me due to being a transfer student. He goes way too fast! His excuse? "You should already know this". His tests are HARD, and you must read everything in the textbook because he tests out of it. His lectures are NOT clear at all. Please avoid if you can!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Really smart guy, not that great at teaching though. He's really scatterbrained. The SI sessions are a lifesaver: go to them! Exams are bi weekly essays and he gives the question (or at least what the exam will cover) the class before. Not that hard to google anything you don't know. If you're good at writing essays, this is the class for you.
                
                   I plan to take every single one of Dr Manson's classes. While his teaching style is not for everyone (its very scatterbrained, something I contribute to his brilliance) if you actively participate and really like biology, you will want to take him as much as possible. You will learn more from one conversation with him than an entire textbook.
                
                   A brilliant professor but a very difficult class. You have to really know what you're talking about in order to compose a decent essay. If you're not interested in bio, his class will be awful for you. The SI sessions were very helpful and I found it hard to take organized notes in class. I got an A, but this class is the reason I changed majors
                
                   Dr. Manson was the worst professor I've ever had. He rambled off topic every single class lecture and wasted a lot of time. He would begin on topic but then get very distracted. It was nice only having to write weekly essays in place of exams but he did not give us much information to compose an essay with in the first place.
                
                   The worst professor I have ever had at Texas A&M. Let me put it to you this way, I ended up with a B in his class and a C in biology 111, and I learned TEN TIMES MORE in Bio 111 than Manson's Bio 112's class. You will NOT learn anything and on top of that, its not a easy class as we expected it. Smart for his own good but REALLY lazy person..
                
                   Dr. Manson is honestly great. These ratings can't really describe his better qualities. He certainly makes the class interesting, and while the class is not easy, it's pretty low stress because he assigns bi-weekly essay tests and occasional tests on the book you have to read, which isnt bad. He is very scatterbrained, but overall I enjoy his class
                
                   Essay test once a week, drops the lowest three. Took him because I thought I would have a better chance at an A since there are so many tests - not the case, he is a hard grader. Very intelligent man trying to teach college kids. Lab typically last 30-45 minutes, some are longer. 8th Day of Creation (book) is a must. My class got very close too.
                
                   Dr. Manson is a good teacher and will make it very easy for you to make a good grade. Many of my classmates did absolutely nothing and made a C. He rarely fails students. Manson is a really funny guy and his labs are simple and last about 20 minutes most days.
                
                   Read the  molecular biology of the cell. it is your bible to this class. You will make an A with no issues if you do. Also read the 8th day of creation. If you do this you will not need the SI sessions and you will make an A. The lab report is easy. I recommend Dr Manson he is very intelligent and will pass you even if you do not try at all.
                
                   His lectures are very scattered and not easy to follow. He definitely loves the subject. I made it through the class by going in the SI sessions twice a week. your grade is based off of weekly quizzes over his lecture on Tuesdat which I like a lot because you have 10 chances to boost your grade. I'm taking him next semester. I recommend him
                
                   He's brilliant, but not necessarily a good professor. He cancels class alot unexpectedly. His lectures very scatterbrained and very hard to follow. I honestly didn't learn anything in that class because I could not understand anything from his lectures. His tests were really weekly quizzes, and I had no idea how to study for them.
                
                   He has a few issues but really knows a lot. The 1 essay test a week may seem scary but he just wants to see what you learned. SI is supper helpful so you dont really need the book.
                
                   Dr Manson is intelligent and knowledgeable no doubt but he's got issues. He cancels class alot (6 times/semester) and he changes his mind alot. He'll tell you one thing in lecture then realize he said it all backwards and email it to you that night. His exams are essays which he gives out the questions a wek in advance. He never gives a 100 on them
                
                   you really need to read the books for his book test but there is only three and he might change that next year, but other than that just go to the SI and google LOL :D
                
                   Good teacher... very smart guy... class consists of one essay test each week and they are not too hard and the SI (supplemental instruction) sessions help a lot
                
                   Terrible, horrible, don't do it, save yourself!! Seems to be in his own world, reads ppt slides word for word, teaches nothing. Totally useless!
                
                   He is probably the worse bio professor ever. If you get him try to get out as soon as possible. You will never learn anything in his class, so don't bother going.
                
                   It is very DIFFICULT to prepare for any exam! He assigns anywhere between 6-20 homework questions (non-graded), and anywhere between 4-10 readings  per lecture. This would be okay, but he doesn't provide a key for the HW questions, so you don't know if they're even right!! 10 lectures per exam--you do the math. Find someone else, he's terrible.
                
                   He has a great way of teaching, but studying for his tests are a little tricky since there is no textbook and his lectures are based on current events. Great notes are essentially required. In my opinion if you are used to straight-forward notes from slides which you can study easily go with that professor.
                
                   Great Class! he teaches Molecular Biology as if he is telling a story. Makes it so interesting. You learn problem solving and experimentation all in one.
                
                   You must go to class! There is no book to go off of and do the study supplements! He gets the questions off of the study supplements.What helped me the most is going to the SI reviews
                
                   There is no book, so you have to come to every lecture to get the notes. Honestly this is one class you CAN'T miss, as the information is so detailed and so broad at times, you have to know what he's talking about and when if you want to do well. ALSO, do the supplemental reviews (go to SIs). 70's are B's and 85's are A's. Hard, but interesting!
                
                   She makes sure that the chapter objectives are clear and lectures with organized materials. In addition, she gives pop quizzes, so be sure to attend the classes to get better grades. The exams are not entirely from past old ones, so make sure you do understand the materials taught in class.
                
                   Dr. Qin is obviously very enthusiastic about what she teaches. However, she uses a test bank (obviously) for her tests, and as such, sometimes is unable to answer questions regarding the correct answer choices after. Furthermore, there is a language barrier evident in her lectures, which are mostly (if not all) images from the textbook.
                
                   Her English is pretty good, but someone will ask her if a topic will be on the exam and she would say no and it would show up on the exam. This happened multiple times. She's a nice person so I don't think she lied, but she is disorganized when it comes to exams. 
                
                   Her lectures are very organized. You also earn extra points through pop quiz. Make you you attend the lectures for extra credit. She is a master instructor.  I really like her.
                
                   Her spoken English is pretty good. Moreover, she takes teaching very seriously and is willing to help students out in and outside the classroom. I really like her and think she is good professor. 
                
                   Do not rely on past exams.  She has pop quizzes. You will have better grades if you attend the classes.
                
                   She's impossible to understand even though she knows a lot about cellular biology. Read the parts of the book that correspond to her lecture slides.
                
                   Hongmin is incredibly knowledgeable, however, has a hard time expressing it.  She is disorganized in lecture and at times condescending in office hours.  Relied heavily on the book.  As long as you memorize the notes you're golden for essay exams.
                
                   She seems nice, but impossible to understand. Her lectures are erratic and have no structure at all. What's most frustrating is that her grammar is so terrible, it take her so long to finish a thought. She also admitted to not being able to pronounce most of the words in the textbook
                
                   This teacher does not know much about cell biology that she has been teaching.
                
                   Asha Rao is a very good professor. I made a 96 on the first exam. All she expects you to do is try to learn the material and pay attention. She takes attendance for bonus and also does LC for bonus. It's a fun class, and it is not at all hard. I am a chemical engineering major and this class has made me want to switch into biochemistry. Take her!
                
                   Go to class, do the readings.
                
                   Dr Rao is cool af. Those who are intimidated by her just dont get her humor. Do the readings, go to her office hours if you need to, ask questions. Put in the work and you'll be fine. I had no biology background and hadnt had a biology class in like 7 years and if you just put in the work you can get an A or B in that class without too much stress.
                
                   Rao is nice in office hours and tries to help but if biology is not initially your strong suit then find a different prof. Test are hard with material and concepts not in her lecture or book that she expects you to know somehow. If you can, take a different prof. Hardest class ever.
                
                   Class is extremely difficult. Would not recommend. She knows her material very well however tests are very difficult.
                
                   THIS CLASS IS HARD BUT IT IS POSSIBLE. If you read the textbook the questions are there. If you fail this class its because you didn't do the work. Dr. Rao is VERY intimidating but if you go visit her, she is very funny and welcoming. If you go to class and do the LC, she will help you on your final grade. I was VERY borderline and she gave me a C.
                
                   Dr. Rao is pretty tough at first and seems pretty harsh. As long as you hang on until the Q drop date, and work hard you should be fine. She gets better and is really not as scary as you think. Very respectable and knowledgeable women who respects students that work for the grade.
                
                   Rao is hands down the most difficult of the 111 profs, but it IS possible to succeed (& get an A) in her class. She is clear with her expectations, & will reward you (points at the end of the semester) if she sees you working hard. READ THE CHAPTERS for each exam, GO TO OFFICE HOURS, and take good lecture notes (recording some classes helped me).
                
                   This is a hard class, but Rao gets an unfair rap. This is the kind of professor that expects you to be able use high level thinking skills. Tips: Go to her office hours (she's much nicer there), participate in class (my final grade got boosted like 5 points for participating), read the textbook, and this class is good for people in science/pre-med.
                
                   She is incredibly tough, but if you work hard, she will help. At the end of the semester she adds participation points which can actually give you a whole letter grade. The class is tough, she is sarcastic, but do NOT give up. If you go to A+, and go to her office hours, (don't let her know about A+), she is phenomenal.
                
                   Dr. Rao is a tough prof, but it is obvious that she cares about her students. She is very helpful in office hours and remembers who you are. Her lectures are interesting, she knows the material extremely well, and she is very funny. She will intimidate you at the beginning, but passing and doing well is definitely doable.
                
                   If you go into office hours she helps. Doesn't curve even if you're one point away from passing. She's awful. I would never take her again.
                
                   Dr. Rao is a very passionate professor. She makes it clear that she will not waste time on students who won't try in her class. Read the chapter material before you go to class, and go to office hours often. I didn't pick up on this until after the second test, but I talked to her and she realized how hard I was working and saw my improved grades.
                
                   Dr. Rao is a very unique individual. If you are a biology major and looking for a challenging class I would probably take her. Her exams are tough and tricky, you really need to understand the concepts. I recommend going to her office hours and really read the PowerPoints she post.  I was able to make a B, I did not take AP biol in high school.
                
                   Rao is hard. She expects you to know the material and then apply it. GO TO A+ TUTORING! Even if she tells you not to cause you at least get the concepts. Also do well in Lab esp. the quizzes cause it's 1/4 the grade! You can't afford to lose those points! Rao will give attendance points and LC extra credit which will help your grade but no curves.
                
                   She tells you that reading the textbook is unnecessary, but it is extremely helpful. She does give a few extra points at the end of the semester for participation in the Learning Catalytic as well as attendance. DO NOT TAKE IF YOU ARE NOT PRE-MED/ BIMS, I did and it was a terrible, terrible mistake.
                
                   Look, I did not have AP Bio or a bio background at all and I really struggled with the material as she expects you to already know a lot of basics. Would SOO recommend her for those that did take AP etc as she is hilarious and VERY nice during office hours; she wanted me to succeed! If you don't have a good background, take a different prof. 
                
                   It was a very difficult class, but Dr. Rao does not sugar coat things. She warned us ahead of time to take things seriously in her class but she's also a very enjoyable lecturer. She is very passionate about biology and really wants her students to succeed. She always told us "I believe in you," even though it was usually before an impossible exam.
                
                   I was very nervous to take asha because of all the bad reviews of her, but she ended up being one of my favorite professors. She sets high expectations for her students, but if you go to class and read the textbook you will be fine. Most of her questions come from her lectures, she was so funny and had a dry sense of humor. Made an A in her class 
                
                   Definitely one of the hardest bio teachers at A&M. Tests are hard and it was difficult for me just to pass. 
                
                   Do yourself a favor and DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF. This was the worst class I ever had...I ended up Q dropping in the end and had to retake with a different professor. Ryan is horribly condescending, monotone, and her tests are nearly impossible. She does not offer any help in her office hours and refuses to help those struggling. Worst prof on campus.
                
                   I struggled a lot before studying in a group. This class is hard on it's own, but Ryan's boring lectures and condescending teaching style does not help at all. It is definitely possible to get an A but you really have to work for it outside of lecture
                
                   Make sure you read the textbook. Her lectures are long and boring, but stay focused. I have to attend tutoring to maintain a C. It's not that she's a bad teacher, the material is just really tough and requires a lot of reading and understanding behind the scenes outside of lecture. If you ask for help she will tell you to "just play with it". 
                
                   Boring lectures, but informational if you can stay awake. Takes genetics part seriously so it's good if you like that. Must read textbook and look at figures to pass.
                
                   First things first: this is a weed out class and yes it is hard. Her lectures are long, boring, and don't really make sense. Her tests are hard, but if you study the topics and try to fully understand them instead of just memorizing stuff you will do alright in the class. She is nice when you go talk to her, but doesn't appear to be approachable. 
                
                   Her tests are always a million times harder than the practice problems she gives. Be prepared for a lot of self-studying 
                
                   Lectures seemed a bit convoluted and and was very broad compared to the textbook therefore it isn't helpful to read it (only to look up concepts and definitions). The homework is not representative of the exam. She asks questions in lecture that usually no one knows the answer to and doesn't really do a good job of explaining.
                
                   I heard Dr. Scanlan was hard in the beginning of the semester. But turns out that he gives you a syllabus with all the answers to what make up 95% of his tests! So memorize the answers and prepare for an easy B if not an A. I personally made an A.
                
                   I took this class in 98 .... cant believehe is still there... you have to memorize the text he wrote.. he was a great help when I had trouble .. so go talk to him if you are struggling.. Go to lab- know every bacteria an virus!! no kidding. Class was so hard I needed an A on final to pass with a C..again Memorized the Text . and I did. Praise God!
                
                   Ridiculous amount of memorization. There is no textbook, just some note packages you buy at media resources. You will have to memorize hundreds of types of bacteria + biochem tests. You even have to spell each bacteria name correctly. He does provide practice tets. Lab is a joke, will add some much needed points. 5 hours of credit so dont make a C!
                
                   I had Dr. S about a decade ago for BIMS Microbiology, and this is by no means an easy class, but I believe he is just trying to instill in his students the WORK ETHIC that it will take to survive grad school and the real world. Yes, in this class you actually have to LEARN!  Thank you, Dr. S for being an INCREDIBLE example for other professors!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very nice, pretty easy, tests mostly off posted study questions and old exams!
                
                   If you want to get a solid foundation of general biology, he's your prof. A little more lively than some of the other profs, and does a good job lecturing. A-Plus correlates VERY closely with the class, so if you want an A, there's your ticket. He won't hesitate to explain any concepts or answer questions, and is passionate about his teaching.
                
                   The best way to do well in Dr. Tag's class is to read the chapters in the textbook that correspond to lecture BEFORE you go to lecture. His lectures are a summary of the chapters in the textbook and are good for solidifying concepts learned from the book. Unfortunately he doesn't cover everything in lecture that's in the book so READ!!
                
                   He's a good teacher and does a pretty good job in keeping his students focused on his lectures considering the material... The class averages are Cs but if you ask him questions after class he doesn't hesitate to help you understand. He goes fast in lecture but he posts his slides online. Go over the slides & you could do without reading the book
                
                   Terrible professor. During his lectures he only reads off of a powerpoint and doesn't explain anything. His tests are very specific, and totally impossible. No extra credit or curve. Attendance isn't mandatory because he never actually teaches anything during class. If you want to have someone read you the material and not actually learn, take Tag.
                
                   Dr. Tag was a very nice person and willing to help you out if you had questions. His tests however are basically impossible unless you can memorize every single thing in the book. This class is constant work outside of reading as well. The more stuff you do to learn the higher chance you have of doing better.
                
                   Dr. Tag is one of the harder Bio professors. TAMU's bio department is hard to begin with, but Tag does not curve at ALL or offer and extra credit like some of the other professors do. I am an honors student and struggled to make a C. Going to a+ is a must, reading the book, and studying at least a week in advance for tests will allow you to pass.
                
                   Dr. Tag's lectures were always interesting, he tried to make the students more interested in what was going on. His tests do have a high level of difficulty (very detailed), but reading the chapters, and outlining them helps a lot. I recommend Khan Academy for further understanding as well as attending SI sessions. 
                
                   Slides come directly from the textbook but do not offer enough information to do well on tests. Classes are pointless and you're better off studying on your own. No extra credit or bonus points.
                
                   Don't pass him by just because grades are low. Bio is hard to begin with. He's willing to answer question in class. He mainly reads of his powerpoint which he later posts online so attendance isn't required. He posts practice exams before each test which are helpful.  
                
                   His lectures are composed of only what the textbook says; you can either go to class or read the book (the book will explain the concepts better). The lectures are often boring.
                
                   He was helpful when I had questions but his tests were super specific but he lectures right from the powerpoint so most people don't even come
                
                   His class is very tough overall, his lecture kind of jumps from place to place which makes the topic being learned very confusing. I went to A+ and SI sessions, read the book, and even made flashcards and everything and only passed his test with grades around a 70. Made a 67,70, and a 66 on the three exams. My class went from full to 1/3 of a class
                
                   Dr. Tag is a better-than-typical biology professor. While the content is pretty boring, he tried to make it seem more interesting. He has a way with his explanations that I thought were hilarious. He teaches straight from the book and posts his notes online so attendance isn't necessary,  but I think he helps explain things well so it would help. 
                
                   I didn't have the money for a textbook but I went to A plus and had a 67,65,and a 70 on the first three tests. The tests are very hard even if you know all the info on the slides or test bank, his wording is tricky and unnecessarily  hard! Maybe it would have been better with the textbook, but I passed.
                
                   Tag was always energetic and seemed to be in a good mood, which made paying attention much easier. Knowing the book backwards and forwards for the tests. I went to A+ and it saved my butt, I didn't read the book at all after the first test and made solid Bs. He posts his slides online.
                
                   A plus was very helpful, lots of questions from the test bank. Lectures were long and boring and not an exact match with the test. I would suggest reading the text book. He liked to pick a couple of random super specific questions for each test. Homework was super easy and usually appeared on the next test
                
                   Lectures have nothing to do with the exams. Reading the book and going to A+ Tutoring, along with having a perfect lab grade will allow you to pass with a D. Extremely difficult class. Most students drop or fail but he keeps teaching because of 10 year. 
                
                   Tag, is a tough professor. But his class is not impossible. His lectures are basically the textbook. Like any Biol 111 class his test are tough, and you need to study a lot. But he's a pretty nice guy and loves to answer questions. He is a goofy professor who acts out topics during lecture. I would take him again. 
                
                   I loved Dr. Tag! He really understands biology and his tests are straight from the book. He doesn't take attendance so I didn't attend a lot of classes but still got A's on every test. He posts his lecture slides to ecampus. When I did go to lectures, I really enjoyed them. He is funny in a nerdy way. If you read the book, you'll be fine. 
                
                   I thought I loved BIO until i took this class. For what it's worth, the course itself is extremely difficult, so it may not all be Tag's fault. Reading is a definite must, and make sure you actually understand what you're reading, because memorization doesn't help on his tests. On the bright side, he was a pretty funny guy!
                
                   Read the book, go to the help sessions, and study for the lab quizzes. The lab quizzes are difficult, but studying hard for them helps. She actually has a powerpoint presentation as opposed to just diagrams from the book which is very helpful. Don't just study the powerpoint though because she takes questions from the book even if she says she won'
                
                   She was an awesome teacher for BIOL111. The lectures cover the same material as the book so you could just go to lecture but the book really helps you to better understand the material. She goes slowly so its less overwhelming for your first college science and she really wants you to learn and is willing to help.
                
                   If you want an A in biology, take Dr. Wan. She moves at a relatively slow pace through the material, which makes studying easier. She also gives bonus questions on the tests. You do have to study, but an A is achievable. Tests are based off lecture, so the book is more for supplementary reading. She is a sweet prof. and her accent isn't a problem.
                
                   Dr. Wan is so kind and approachable. She is always ready to help and answer questions. The best way to study for her exams is with her online lecture notes, her online study guides, and notes from class. It is also very helpful to study with classmates and A+ Tutoring is a lifesaver!!
                
                   Her accent gets easier to understand with time. Her lectures drag out and majority of the time you're focusing at the wall because it's more interesting than the powerpoint. She's really nice and willing to help, you just have to attend SI or office hours. Tough tests, tough teacher. She's expecting a lot from you.
                
                   reading and going to Aplus is essential for an easy A. Found a website (easynotecards) where her test questions are very similar. I studied these a week before the test and made a 103. very good professor but she is very behind in her lectures so if you are taking 112 after, I wouldnt recommend her or you might be behind 
                
                   Lecture goes by somewhat fast, so  I recommend recording her lecture and taking pictures of the slides then go home and take notes from the two. It is extremely boring but she does go over everything that you need to know for the test. I never read the book for the class and ended up with a B.
                
                   Professor Wan is a very nice teacher, she was very helpful when I came to her during office hours. Some people might have a hard time understanding her, while others won't. I personally never had difficulty listening to her. I think that her tests are fair, it may seem hard, but that's only because college questions are on a different level.
                
                   Hard class, too many details and overall too picky about details in the chapter, A+ tutoring is recommended
                
                   Good teacher. Her class definitely isn't hard. Her lectures are super important so GO TO CLASS. She has a lot of extra credit and her material is not too bad either. Study hard for the tests and an A is definitely doable! :)
                
                   Dr. Wan is definitely the best Biology 111 professor here. Her accent is not bad at all. I repeat, her accent is NOT bad. Go to class and SI sessions are helpful as well. Read and work hard and an A is definitely possible. I recommend you start off strong so you aren't playing catch up at the end. All tests have 7.5 extra credit points. 
                
                   She made understanding biology easy!  She provides her lecture notes once finishing each chapter and posts old exams to practice. Bio is hard and i found out half way through the semester that she pulls her question from the test bank, memorize those and you'll get an A on every exam! You need to read to understand the material! BEST BIO PROF HERE 
                
                   I would recommend reading the book before exams because she likes to randomly throw in details from the book! I would also recommend memorizing your first two tests' questions and answers before your final because over half of your final will be from those tests! Good luck!
                
                   I loved taking class from Wei Wan! Her accent isn't bad at all and her tests aren't bad if you read the book and work hard. She also puts her old tests online so you can use those to study, and she gives bonus questions on all the tests which is really nice.
                
                   Her accent isn't that bad at all. She's super nice and approachable. She always has 4 bonus questions on tests so... Miss four and you can still get a 100. Most of her questions are from lecture, so go to class... But if you were to just read the book, that would be ok, too. Just study before tests and you'll get an A
                
                   Really a smart lady, knows her stuff. Only problem is she has a really thick accent, pretty hard to understand sometimes. She does know that her accent is bad, and she's willing to explain or write down words that are hard to understand. Go to class, because the power points she puts up don't cover everything.
                
                   There is definitely a language barrier. She also is very soft spoken. After a while people just stopped showing up. The labs are very helpful. She does give one extra credit assignment. Other than that you just have to study and do well on the exams.
                
                   Must attend her classes to get the notes, she is hard to understand but extremely GENEROUS! She gives extra credit on your final overall grade just by taking quizzes or asking questions in class. I would have made a C, but with the EC i made an A! Tests are hard but she is so sweet and the extra credit makes up for the tests!
                
                   she is a very nice lady, but hard to understand. she tries to relay information correctly but it doesn't always work. her tests are pretty difficult, but only because she words them weird. go to A+ tutoring, it helps a lot. she goes through the slides pretty fast. a good choice if you have no other option, but try and get someone else.
                
                   The class is not hard if you study. You NEED to study for the tests, but I've managed to make As on them, so it's definitely not impossible. The class average is usually in the low 70's, but she is very helpful, and there are opportunities for extra credit. Honestly, I love her. I find her to be a great professor.
                
                   Hard class to focus in, especially at the end of the day. I mostly studied using the online text book and consistently made 70-80 on the tests. Class test average was usually in the low 70s. Slight curves on tests
                
                   Tests over the notes !!! only refer to the textbook for diagrams, life cycles, etc. Test questions are extremely tricky , so don't assume a choice is correct.  Very very easy to approach and ask for advice/help. She doesn't make biology boring, even though its just memorizing taxonomies
                
                   if ur good at bio u'll make an A. if u have a hard time u'll have to work harder.
                
                   Alexis was so informative and helpful throughout the entire semester. I learned more in her lab than I did in lecture! She genuinely cares about her students and was always there to help me. She knows the material front and back and does an incredible job of teaching it. Seriously, turned a boring class in to something really interesting. 
                
                   Ms Cochran was one of the best I have had in commerce.  Really cared about students-haters prob failed LOL!
                
                   If you can at all avoid it, DO NOT TAKE THIS INSTRUCTOR! A career in biology requires a firm foundation in the basics which you will not find here. She does not understand what she is teaching, and can't answer even the simplest of questions. If you are smart at all STAY AWAY FROM THIS CLASS!
                
                   She is very approachable and will answer all your questions.  You will have to study and know your Mastering Bio. I would take a class with her again.
                
                   I would like to make sweet love with miss cochran while shes teaching me about cellular respiration. Easy course btw! Highly recommend this class.
                
                   Miss Cochran is a Dime Piece. Finest red head everrr. Class is hella easy. Take this class for sure.  Merry Xmas!
                
                   Tough course, but a Very fair teacher, exams are hard, you have to put soo much time and effort into this class. its almost impossible to pass her exams if you study a week before. She tries to make biology fun in her power points, has a really good personality, would deffinetly take her again because i know what is expected from her.
                
                   The worst teacher I've had so far.  She doesn't explain anything.  Her exams are almost impossible to pass, much less do well on.  I will never take another one of her classes again.
                
                   She is hard but fair.  You have to study, but you have to study for Slovack more!  She tries to prepare you for the rest of biology classes-stop whining and STUDY!
                
                   Horrible!  She doesn't teach.  She reads off the Power Point presentations and doesn't explain anything.  I've heard she was a good lab instructor.  Maybe she should go back to doing that.
                
                   This teacher taught my ecology lab. She is very strict on the formatting of the lab papers. So get your formatting done properly and you will be fine.
                
                   I took the lab course and it was very good.  I enjoyed it and the professor.  I absolutely hate science but she made it very enjoyable.
                
                   I learned a lot from Dr Choi about viruses. I had to work at it though. He doesn't just make his tests really easy but they're doable if you work and study.
                
                   Best professor ever.  
                
                   Choi is a good teacher. However, he really doesn't help during office hours.  He kinds of just rushes you away. It seems as if he doesn't like being asked alot of questions (very short on words). Gather all the info you can in class becase it's intimidating trying to communicate with him afterwards!!!! :-(
                
                   Let me preface this by saying that Dr. Choi is a super nice guy.  This class is just ridiculously difficult and you must have SOME background before going into it because he teaches as if you do.  Definitely the hardest course I have ever taken for Nursing school.  Liked him as a person but not as a professor.  Very hard to understand his lectures!
                
                   Dr. C has been one of the most inspiring and interesting teachers I have ever had. I came into the class thinking I would not enjoy Cell Biology, that it was just another required credit, but during the course I found myself curious in the subject's applications. He might seem a little intimidating and hard, but he is a funny and awesome teacher.
                
                   I took both BSC 303 and 304. The lectures are most beneficial if you've read in advance; then they work more as reaffirming and/or clarifying what you read. Dr. Cheriyath is funny and brings real world application to the subject matter. If you work hard and read your textbook and A is entirely possible. 
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath is truly one of the best professors I have had yet. In his lectures, he always includes information about issues and topics that are impertinent  in today's society. He is very passionate and knowledgeable about cell biology and genetics and will always answer any question you have. Hard, but you gain so much from this class!
                
                   Grades the work himself so he understands what you know.  Show him your interest in learning and he will exceed your expectations! Don't be intimidated by his strong personality, that is just his passion for the work. When you leave his class you will have a competitive advantage over those who opted for an easy grade from another professor! 
                
                   The class was fun; enjoyed Dr. Chaeriyath's clicker questions; learned a lot in his class. He really cares about his students and inspire to reach your fullest potential. Although, I got a "B" in this class, it is worth more than an "A" that I received in other classes. I recommend this professor.
                
                   He says he's there to help you but when it comes down to it, if you don't completely conform to how he thinks you should study, he will not be happy. He can be very passive aggressive and will call you out in front of class. Be ready for all work to be based in critical thinking. Memorization does not help, you need to know and apply the material.
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath knows the subject matter and is able to teach in a way that draws you into the material. His lectures move quickly, but he teaches concepts clearly so you are well equipped for the speed. There are weekly problem sets. If you read these should be fairly simple. Tests are conceptually based (multiple choice format). Highly Recommend! 
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath has the ability to bring out the best in his students. He will make you think and will inspire you everyday. I loved his lectures and would take each and every class with him if I get the opportunity.
                
                   I learned a great deal from this class and from Dr. Cheriyath. His teaching methods focus on critical thinking and emphasize grasping concepts. Dr. C challenges his students  to do their best and to excel. He is helping me become more concise, methodical and to apply my mind beyond what I read in the text book
                
                   Great professor, you want to learn Cell Biology take his class; provides live interactive lectures for online courses and follow active learning methods. He can take complex matters and simplify it; passionate about science and care about student learning. Although his tests (especially multiple choice) were very hard, I learned a lot.
                
                   Very good professor. Excellent knowledge of the subject matter. Great at challenging critical thinking skills. His classes are worth every penny.
                
                   Very good professor. 
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath is by-far the best professor I have had so far. Not only does he understand the material he teaches, he also is able to present it in a engaging manner. He has a global approach to teaching and discusses issues such as job availability and salaries that are relevant to students. I would gladly have him as a professor again!
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath is a great professor! He has flexible office hours and takes the time to get to know you. Lectures are interactive and assignments are straightforward. Tests in this class really show you what you do and don't know. Success in Dr. C's class is simple if you are determined to learn. Study Hard & Good Luck :)
                
                   Dr. Cheriyath is an awesome professor who will help you throughout the course if you are willing to put your fair share into it. If you work for your grade you will get will what you deserve in the course. He is not the hardest prof as everyone says, you have to show enthusiasm for the work you are performing. He is the one of the best I have seen!
                
                   The best professor I have ever had. He is always willing to help students and is often available outside office hours. During lectures, he makes difficult subjects easier to understand and he also keeps the class interactive and interesting. His course builds problem solving skills and material retention, which help make many other classes easier!
                
                   He is an amazing professor that helps you. He is flexible in terms of office hours and available when help is required. Many people think his course is hard but when you read the textbooks, pay attention in class and put a little effort into the course, an A is guaranteed! Good Luck to all of the students who have him as a prof in the future! :D
                
                   Dr. C is a great teacher/mentor. his class presentations are so helpful and he makes his lectures more interesting by relating biology to our daily life . He wants students to be more active in the class and interact by discussing the material. He is a hard teacher but you get what you work for in his class.
                
                   Extremely knowledgeable, Dr. C can take complex concepts and break it down so that it become easy to understand. The best part is he then links each of the simplified concepts to day-to-day life situations. If you feel like his exams are hard, step-up and put more effort, you will be able to apply what you learned in his class in other courses
                
                   The absolute best teacher I've ever had. I learned so much and have retained it in to my other classes. This class has made every other class I've taken easier.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Online labs were nice because you could retake them over and over until you get a good grade. Discussions are optional which is NICE! Tests/Quizzes are difficult but if you read and study they are doable.
                
                   Though I hated almost everything about this course, this professor was the easiest and quickest to communicate with, the most caring, and by far best overall professor I have ever been in class with. That being said, if you can take it face to face DO, if you don't have to take in the summer DON'T!!!!
                
                   This person is horrible instructor. He does not teach anything in class. Has a horrible accent, cant understand hardly anything he says. He also has a bad attitude problem. He has the napoleon complex. He thinks since he is the department head he can do whatever he wants. Constantly lies about things. He is had to get a hold of. I had to come by h
                
                   Anyone who says Henley is hard should try taking Slovak.  Made an F in his class studying 16 hours a week and then turned around and made a B with Henley studying half as much.  This is a difficult class.  Don't trash Henley because she is teaching a tough class.  She is a good professor.  
                
                   Dr. Henley was an amazing instructor for this Biology course. She was always available to help out her students, even after class. All her exams are very straight-forward and filled with bonus questions. You have to do your part and study, obviously. She definitely cares about her students and does not want you to fail.
                
                   The lectures are engaging, and often punctuated with interesting tidbits about whatever animal we are discussing.  While the tests cover large amounts of material, she provides everything necessary in the lecture.  All you need to do is pay attention and learn your notes to do well.
                
                   I loved Dr. Henley! She does teach the material following the book. She uses Mastering Biology, and allows you to use it for test reviews. She tests 4 chapters at a time, and her tests are comprehensive.She does traditional lecture, so keep yourself engaged during class, she tells you what you need to know for the test the class before.
                
                   Whoever thinks this class is hard is not even trying. If you think this class is hard, why don't you take 102 with Slovack&#63; I never had to study for the tests, I never had to read the book, and I still made an A. If you flunked you either didnt take notes or didnt study them for the test. This is one of the easiest classes I have ever had...
                
                   This class was very difficult to follow. Her lectures were disorganized which was hard to understand. Dont bother buying the book, because she doesnt go over half of what is in it.Tests did not follow with lectures in any way. But she does let you know what is going on in the class by e-mail.
                
                   This class feels like a waste because I haven't gained anything by the way she teaches. Avoid her if possible! Nothing good comes from her class or her teachings.
                
                   This class = torture.She expects way to much&if she paid attention to the students in her class doing poorly, she should've helped us in some way-instead of ignoring the majority failing.It may be to much to ask of her,not to cram 6 chapters into one test!Im not a genuis- apparently neither is she!
                
                   This is the worst class I have this semester. She teaches as if we are all Biology majors, which none of us are. She tests us over 6 or more chapters at a time. She is crazy, and not very helpful at all toward her students. At least half of the class has a C or is failing- she should be concerned!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is personable and sweet!  Her tests arent too bad and she cares about each and evry student that she teaches!  Shes Fabulous!!!
                
                   The class material for the class was interesting, and I gained hands on experience, but the manner in which it was taught made me dread going to class.
                
                   I had him for animal science, and while the class was very easy, the tests were very very hard. You need to go every day and write down everything he says for the tests, because you never know what will be on them.
                
                   Great teacher, professional, clear, if you respect him you will learn so much. Write down everything he says and you will pass with flying colors. Never liked or understood biology until him. Nice to still have an American science teacher.
                
                   VERY egotistical. His opinions are the only &quot;right&quot; ones and he's very quick to bash christianity. Yes, religion should be left out of it, but when someone sneezes and he tells the class to &quot;grow up&quot; after saying &quot;bless you&quot;
                
                   Wonderful professor.  Very knowledgable about subject matter.  Requires college-aged maturity and expects appropriate classroom behavior.  I really benefitted from his class and learned to enjoy and appreciate Biology.
                
                   He's a terrible professor, and he has trouble putting things into laymen's terms. He thinks that since he understands it everyone will. That being said, he's super attractive.
                
                   He knows the subject very well, just can't teach it properly. Otherwise a good professor...
                
                   He is very helpful! He posts notes and previous exams, and is often available for extra help. His tests are hard, but fair and cover material in his notes.
                
                   Very, very intelligent.  Dr. Miskevich knows his stuff and is a good teacher.  Has a little trouble bringing it down to most students, but it's really not that bad with a little self study.
                
                   Reads from powerpoint instead of teaching.  Likes to make students feel stupid when they ask questions.
                
                   VERY BORING. Doesn't explian very well.  If you didn't understand what he said the first then he would try to explain it again, but this time he adds something new.  He is not a very good biology teacher.
                
                   Very boring, not a good teacher at all.  Will make you feel stupid if you ask questions.  Has a real attitude problem.
                
                   I hated going to this class! I could hardly keep myself awake. When you asked a question you did not get an answer. you got another question attatched to an excuse.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   New professor who doesn't take disrespect lightly.  Listen, do your lab, ask questions and know whats due the following week. 
                
                   He is very helpful.  Always has lab materials ready, makes it easy to get in do the lab and leave.  Tests are somewhat hard, but he gives a good review.
                
                   Greatest biology professor, love this guy. I did not go into his office hours as much as I should have. The course is easy if you study, it is not meant to be easy. He warns you at the beginning of the semester. Don't wait to study, you need to start studying the first day of class- the last day of class. IT IS HARD BUT EASY IF YOU TRY!
                
                   He's a great lecturer, but will make you work for your grade. He may seem intimidating, but he's really helpful and nice in person.
                
                   Dr. Slovaks introduction to biology course (bsc 1406) was definitely a tough class. I heard this is one of the first few years he taught freshman introduction into biology. He's a good professor but if your major is NOT Biology then I would switch proffesors. Definitely a make-or-break class.
                
                   Dr. Slovack's exams were super challenging. Sometimes there would even be material not covered in lecture. Be prepared to study your behind off like never before. Do not even THINK about skipping a single lecture; take notes, read the chapters and study hard! He does not give any extra credit. He has the coach mentality, so yes, he's strict. No A's
                
                   Worst professor I ever had. Doesn't care at all about his students and thinks he knows everything. I even tried talking to him outside of class and he told me exactly how I should run my life for my future plans. News flash your a biology professor not a counselor. Wouldn't recommend this professor to anyone. 
                
                   Dr. Slovak is very straightforward. He spells out his expectations early and throughout the class he stands by them. Dr. Slovak keeps you on your toes by calling on students randomly to answer questions. The tests in this class are challenging, but appropriate. When you walk away from this class you can be proud knowing you earned your grade. 
                
                   One of the best professor I ever had. Yes, it is a hard class but if you want to major in medical he is the guy who will prepare you in pursuing a career in medical field. And one thing we need to take in consideration is that MEDICAL FIELD is not an "EASY" field to major in, it requires lot of passion and hardwork that we got to put in. 
                
                   This is one of the hardest classes you will ever take. If you are not a Biology major then I advise you to not take this class
                
                   If you've ever been an athlete, you will love this guy. He is a coach in a professor's body and holds you accountable for everything that you need to take away from his class. Everyone is right, he's hard, but you will learn the subject from him thoroughly...or you'll run laps.
                
                   The best prof I've had at the university so far! He really knows what he is talking about and explains things in a way that makes it easy to understand. People say that it is impossible to get an A in his class but that is NOT true. If you show up to class and read 1/2 hrs a day so you really understand the material you will get an A!
                
                   Awesome professor. Teaches like a coach and expects you to perform like an intellectual athlete. If you have a strong biology background his classes are decently challenging, but not hard. Though he seems intimidating at first, Dr. Slovak is very knowledgable and easy to talk to.
                
                   This class is a BEAT-DOWN!!!  It's taught like a 300 level course and the tests are brutal.  Good prof but you will only get an A or even B if you have 30 hours a week to study.  I wish I would have known before taking this class. . I would have never signed up.
                
                   Class information was  informative, but tests were brutal and most questions were not from book or class. You won't make an A or probably even a B in the class unless you eat, sleep & breath Biology. Personally, I would NEVER take another class from this instructor. My advice, take this class elsewhere if you need a good grade for pre-med,etc.
                
                   One of the best instructors in the department. He is hard, but he will give you a solid foundation. If you do well in his class you will definitely do well as a biology major. All in all a great teacher.
                
                   You have to be serious and interested in the subject. its not an easy A.
                
                   Very very hard. His lectures and powerpoints are crap. Your book is going to be your best friend. Half the test is multiple choice the other half is essay..not short answer but essay. There is about 10 essay questions and its worth 60 percent of the test. No review! If you have to take it, dont take anything else with it!!
                
                   his class is very hard...i worked really really hard and ended up with a B. its ok if u have a lot of time to study, but i wouldnt recommend taking his class with another hard class. my only complaint was that 3/4 of the material was human biology, and since i am pre marine bio, this did not help me in any way.
                
                   One of the all time best teachers of my entire school tenure. He is awesome and very funny.Take him no matter what.
                
                   This is an extremely hard subject, but Dr. Slovak warns you from the very start. He comes on strong, but underneath is a great guy. Once you get to know him, he is sweet, cute, and very funny. His jokes and stories are so unexpected, it's adorable, because normally, he's pretty serious. He definitely knows his stuff. Oh yeah, VERY SEXY guy!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class was easy in the sense that if you studied you can get an &quot;A&quot;.  Hell!!! she gives you all her notes on power point and they all match the tests.  There's nothing on the test that's not in these notes.
                
                   this class is killing me. thought I was going into forensic science.  looks like patrol office for me. good teacher  fair clear.  the information is just too hard
                
                   Very clear with expectations up front. Very Helpful. Loved this teach...
                
                   I was and still am very impressed by this lady.  She is very intelligent and helpful, she will make time for you if there is the need.  I enjoyed her class, if you can't handle Sinha, stay away from Slovak!!!!!!
                
                   very very hard.  i went to a magnet high school for biology and yet could barely pull a D in the class.  very hard to understand, doesn't answer questions clearly, and not clear on assignments.  changed my major b/c of her.
                
                   If you want to work she is very helpful. Take another class if you are a slacker
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Try to avoid taking this teacher.  She does not speak clearly.  She does not understand questions well enough to answer them.  Ask your advisor if you can substitute another class for BSC 101 because she is the only one that teaches it.  A NIGHTMARE!!!!
                
                   Very good teacher... You will learn alot if you try... She is kinda hard to understand at first but you get used to it
                
                   Very nice and helpul teacher!!!
                
                   She provides printable power point slides to follow along in class with.  If you pay attention in class and use the CD that comes with the book, you'll do fine.
                
                   I took turley at Collin college.I liked her she kept everything simple. We have 3 practicals the second is the hardest nearly everyone failed it. The 1st and 3rd are the easiest. All the quizzes are online which I loved and you have 1 lab report VERY EASY. I would take her again but she barley responds to emails. Didn't buy the book wasn't worth it
                
                   I took Professor Turley's class last year and enjoyed it. The class is not too bad, but it gets harder at the end. I recommend to attend all sessions to get the most out of the class so that you will understand the tests better. Although I received an A in the class, it wasn't an easy A for me.
                
                   the class is pretty easy if you put in the work, and if you go to the SI sessions you will get a practice test with most of the actual test questions on it. There are also two extra credit options, attendance gives you 15 extra points and going to SI sessions gives you 10 points. She has an accent so it can sometimes be hard to understand her tho
                
                   I absolutely love her class. Shes a good professor and i love her enthusiasm to the subject. She isn't monotone and she loves what she does. Go to the SI sessions, attend class, do the homework, and do the quizzes and you should be fine. She tries very hard to help students understand and her in class quiz questions are on the test as well.  
                
                   The quizzes in class are easy, the homework is easy, her exams are difficult. She gives the si leader like 20 questions that are going to be on the exam to go over with you so at least you know you'll get some correct. Gives extra credit for attending si and for attendance. She is hard to understand. Terrible with notes.
                
                   Dr. Doyungan is a wonderful professor her laugh is so cute, I have her in my lab every week and she is so knowledgable. Of coarse she makes you work for an A but what professor wouldn't. She explains everything perfectly and her accent is fine I understand everything. If you needed extra help with something she is always there to help you.
                
                   I love this class! Dr. Doyungan is so awesome and gives you her undivided attention to make sure that you understand the material clearly. I recommend Dr. D to anyone that needs to take mico. This class was very knowledgable and her teaching methods make it fun and easy to understand. She was always there if you needed help with any of the material
                
                   She's hard to get used to, but a good teacher. She doesn't lecture all of whats on her exams, but make sure to read the book and you'll be golden. Show up! She does qwizdom every class, so make sure you have yours and you're paying attention! Randomly gives extra credit!!!
                
                   I was extremely nervous about taking this class considering I hadn't taken Biology since my freshman year of high school, but Doyungan made it so easy to understand! She made the class enjoyable and interesting for me. Take notes! Go to SI sessions! Don't skip class and you'll get major extra credit. Loved her!
                
                   The class is challenging, but if you study frequently, you'll be okay. Professor has a slight accent but she is clear and helpful during lecture!
                
                   Prof. Doyungan was a very easy professor and the class was easy, but the tests were difficult. As long as you attend the class and took advantage off all extra credit assignments your grade turns out good. All semester I had a C but with all the bonus points added in the end I wound up making a B. Do the prelab quizzes and show up to class!
                
                   Very easy. Don't forget to do the pre-lab quizzes because there is no make up for these. Overall, just come prepared and do the notes/study guide before class. Write down everything she says because she throws random material in her tests. She gives out bonus points for good attendance so good luck!
                
                   This teacher is such a sweetheart! She makes jokes and tries to keep the class intersting. She curves tests and all her questions are straight off the chapter studyguides she makes! she is very approachable and nice! best teacher i had so far.
                
                   I love this teacher her accent isn't hard to understand at all.You need to go to class all days due to the quizdom quizzes that are every class meeting but they are really easy and its just over the information shes going over that day in class she makes grate power points and lecture study guides and test are straight from study guides.
                
                   People, these comments are really uncalled for. Her accent isn't bad (trust me, I know of WORSE professors), and plus she works really hard to make biology easy to understand. Her questions are not meant to be tricky, but to make students think (like you would in the real world). I have zero biology background prior to her class and I got an A+
                
                   Awful. I did all the homework, came to every class, and still had NO idea what she was talking about. Accent is thick, so it's pretty hard to understand her. Class is SUPER boring. She is the type of teacher to out 8 correct answers on the test and tell you to choose the most right one. Tests are made to trick you, not help you. Horrible experience
                
                   I took her for Marine Mammals and it was her first time to teach the subject.  Try to write what she says to correspond to the slide she is on so you have to write less but also so you can study better for the 3 exams.
                
                   Dr. Gardner is a fun professor who really knows her stuff. Her tests can get very specific and her power points tend to be cluttered. She also tends to spend a lot of time on one or two slides and still tests on the whole 100 slide power point. I suggest you try to write notes on the slides for later. Also she tends to get distracted easily. 
                
                   Incredible Professor. Although, I recommend not taking this course your first semester of college because it is very rigorous. Students taking this their first semester typically struggle as they are still getting accustomed to college. The amount of information you have to know is insane but I promise if you read the powerpoint it can be done. 
                
                   Dr. Gardner is the bomb. Her class is tough due to the amount of material that you must learn in one semester, but it is A&P II and it's not suppose to be easy! Her class has taught me that dedication does pay off. It is hard, but it is way worth it to have those "ahh-ha" moments and really understand concepts rather than just facts. 
                
                   She is one of my favorite professors I've ever had the opportunity to take. She gives you all the tools to be successful, but it's up to the students to utilize them. She is more than willing to help her students understand during her office hours, but everything you need to know is on her power point presentations. She is one amazing woman! )
                
                   I loved learning from this professor. She knows when students are getting tired and will crack a joke or go off topic to pull you back in again. She asks for her students to go see her super helpful. Her tests are tuff. Don't just memorize but understand concepts and you will do wonders. Go to class! She wants you to succeed. Just know the ppts! 
                
                   Awesome professor! Take notes along with the power points, study for a week in advanced & you'll do great. I've taken her a&p 2 class twice, & her summer classes are much easier. If you ask for help she's more than willing to help you understand everything. You have to workstudy for your grade, but the final replaces the lowest grade. Attend class
                
                   Dr. Gardner is very energetic, so the lectures were always fun and interesting. All of the test material comes from the powerpoints, and I would recommend printing them out before class and taking notes on them. Each test has 8-10% bonus, and she will say what the bonus questions are during lecture. The class isn't difficult if you study well. (:
                
                   Tough course due to content but she provides you with opportunities to do well in the course (extra credit, lab, optional final, exam replacement). She's very funny and personable. Listen in lecture bc she will give you hints on what she wants you to know for exam. 
                
                   I was surprised to find out that her class is NOT as tough as everyone make it out to be. In all honesty, you just need to study. Make notecards of everything on the PowerPoints for both lecture and lab. Go to class to get bonus pointsbonus answers since she offers about 8%-10% in bonus pts for each exam. SI is very helpful.
                
                   Dr. Gardner is by far my favorite teacher! You definitely have to work hard in this course. She does not play favorites, and is fair. Be sure to study for the test, because the class only consist of 3 tests, a final, and the lab. GO TO CLASS! Dr. Gardner is hilarious, and makes the class environment fun. I definitely recommend taking her! 
                
                   I had her for A&P II. She knows her stuff and knows how to explain it at a basic level. You must take notes during lecture if you want to do well on her tests.  She gives plenty of opportunities for bonus points. This class is not easy to make an A. However, it is attainable if you are willing to put in the effort.  BE READY FOR POP QUIZZES. 
                
                   She is probably one of the best A & P professors you can have. 1.) she is funny and very relatable in her lectures. 2.) she genuinely wants you to pass. 3.) she is very clear and thorough about what she wants 4.) she gives you extra credit and help. This is the kind of class in which you have to memorize, memorize, memorize. 
                
                   Anatomy and Physiology 2 is suppose to be hard, but this was an impossible class for me. Has 3 tests, and drops the lowest test grade for lecture. Power points the most disorganized I have ever seen. Taught very sporatically,  tests were next to impossible. Class averages of our 3 tests were 65,68 & 67. Had to drop the class. Impossible teacher.
                
                   This class is difficult but she is a really good professor! She goes off powerpoints so I recommend printing them out and writing notes during lecture. She adds wordssentences in. Also, please visit her office hours if you don't understand something. That saved me in the end! She can turn your B into an A if she sees you're putting in the effort.
                
                   She is a really great professor. Yes she has a german accent, but she will repeat or write anything down that you don't understand. She goes out of her way to help students who do not understand. It's a conceptual course so memorization for lecture won't help you have to understand!
                
                   The class is quite challenging, but Dr.Gardner knows how to break material down to understandable pieces! Sure she has a slight accent, but it's not incomprehensible. Make sure you really pay attention in class and study EVERYTHING. If you do this, you'll be fine.
                
                   I can honestly say I went into this class wanting to be a nurse, and left with a change of major form in hand. I am not sure if it is the course or the way she teaches that makes it unclear. German accent certainly does not help in understanding the information. She was very unreliable when it came to office hours. I do not recommend taking her.
                
                   Pretty challenging course, mainly because the only grades you receive are from the tests, and lab. I cant even start to tell you what to study for the tests. Basically study EVERYTHING. She is a pretty cool lady, she just goes over a lot of information and is very detailed on the tests.
                
                   While Anatomy and Physiology should be an interesting course to those who are interested, Dr Gardner does not make it so. I feel she focuses on information that offer little to no use in future classes or careers. Instead of talking about receptors, and ion channels we should be discussing the relationships between organs and causes of disease.
                
                   Grise is one of THE BEST professors at TAMUCC. If you're lazy, you will not pass. If you put in a lot of effort, you can get several 100s on his exams like several of my friends and I did. Study in groups ALWAYS. SI sessions have a lot of info you WILL NOT get in class. Go to him for anything he has personally given me career advice 
                
                   Make sure you attend class everyday! He has in class points  that will hurt your grade if you miss. Study for TLAs in depth. His test are not too bad, but it's not just from the Book. He likes you to think about real scenarios. Overall, the class isn't too bad. He's approachable if you have any questions
                
                   Go to class every single class period. Study for TLA's very well. The test are hard, and sometimes he throws curveballs at you that you may not be expecting. The tests cover more than just the book, he tests you over what he discusses in class. But, as long as you read the chapters, do that homework and study, the test aren't too horrible.
                
                   He is by far my favorite professor. I couldnt have learned this class without his help. He is tough, Ill give you that but that's what makes it so great. He tells you what you need/should know and explains everything into detail. Go to some/all SI sessions, and get to know him so he knows you. If you're a Bio major, DEF pick him!
                
                   Grise is by far one of the best professors at TAMUCC. Everyone thinks he is hard because they do not want to study. If you just attend class, go to a couple of SI sessions, and study for the TLA's and exams, you will get a good grade
                
                   One of the toughest classes i've ever taken. Definitely need to study a lot for his class. He is hard but he is very smart and passionate about teaching.
                
                   Not an easy professor and you will realize that once you attend his class. Overall, he loves his job, but he expects you to know almost everything coming in your first day of college. He teaches at way to high of a skill level that most of his students aren't at yet. YOU NEED TO ATTEND CLASS or you will fail, as well SI sessions are very helpful.
                
                   His class was challenging! He constantly made us use the book and study. You WILL NOT PASS is you do not study.
                
                   Dr. Grise's class is definitely not a class you can glide by in. To pass you definitely need to attend class and his SI sessions definitely help out a lot. His final is completely comprehensive and is taken from questions on old tests. Good teacher, hard class.
                
                   Dr. Grise is a great professor, but he is not easy. You need to attend lectures every day and SI sessions are extremely helpful! He can kinda get a little boring sometimes and confusing as well, but overall he knows what he is talking about and he's very interested in all of it which shows how passionate he is about teaching.
                
                   Make sure you keep up with the readings and attend EVERY lecture. He will help you if you ask. He prepares you for future Biology related courses.
                
                   I'm still taking his class. I was reading this before attending his class and it scared me! I thought he was going to be so hard but nope:) he is very helpful and he loves diagrams so don't take for granted the pictures. GO TO SI SESSIONS they are super helpful!!! he loves what he's doing and he transmits it, he was really good
                
                   Must attend class, take clear note, and go to SI Sessions. I do put a couple extra hours into this class versus my other classes and it helps. Being ranked number 6 out of 286 was an accomplishment by going to SI for better understanding.
                
                   If your a non-bio major take it in the summer. He is a good teacher but you do have to pay attention and go to the SI session. I never took bio before and made a B in the class during summer.
                
                   Dr. Gris is an awesome teacher and a very enjoyable person to be around. That being said, his class is challenging and will definitely give you and great foundation in Biology. If your not a Bio major, avoid him and take another professor. I went into this class nervous as a result of all the negative things I heard, but left proud I had taken it.
                
                   You MUST attend class to learn the concepts. He is approachable and will answer questions you may have. Sends out a progress report after every lecture.
                
                   If you plan on taking this class, I would suggest going part time or taking easier classes along with it. This class requires a lot of time outside of class to pass. Only 15 ppl got As, about 30 got a B, around 70 ppl got a C, and the rest failed or dropped.We had a class around 300. I would not recommend this course. He's helpful but difficult.
                
                   You hear a lot of people say that his class is hard. I took his MW class and enjoyed his lectures. He knows what he's talking about, if you go to SI session at least once a week you will pass the class. Don't skip class because it will efect your grade and might cause you to fail. He is very helpful and replies to e-mails very fast. I learned a lot
                
                   Hes a great etcher and if you are in his class you will be prepared for the future. A good amount of people complain about him but they tend to be the ones that are't intelligent.
                
                   Dr. Grise's class will truly prepare you if you are majoring in biology or biomed. If you are not, don't take him because his class is challenging. If you try and constantly go to tutoring you can make it out of his class with an A. if you're not willing to put forth 100% effort, an A is almost impossible.
                
                   The class was very boring. Its one of those classes that you have to take because its required but it won't teach you anything new. He's an good guy. Easy but booooring class.
                
                   she is a really cool TA. she will help you with whatever you need if you are interested in learning about the material. its a get in get out kinda class. shes really nice and grades easy as long as you do the work and turn it in on time
                
                   The first day of lab I was a little concerned because of Ms. King's age, but after the first day I knew everything would be fine. She really knows what she is doing and has a teaching style that is easy to follow and understand. She doesn't take any slack from the kids in the class and I appreciate that about her.
                
                   I really enjoyed her class and actually learned more in lab than I did in lecture...
                
                   She is an awesome teacher!!! Very laid back but helped everyone that required assistance.
                
                   I had Vannesa for my lab instructor for my Bio class. The only thing she made clear in the course was how her named was spelled as it is abnormal. Half of the questions students asked she did not know the answer to and didn't bother to look for an answer. If you don't understand something, she talks to you like you are stupid for not knowing.
                
                   Great professor!  She makes you think you can do it!  Was my first professor in college and it was awesome.  I only wish more professors were like her!  Rock On Dr. M!!
                
                   Dr. Maurstad was the greatest!  Her high school teaching experience made me interested in Biology and now I am a high school science teacher.  I would have never went into science if it were not for her (and her frequent references to the X files!).  I will miss her so much!  She showed me that science doesn't have to be hard if you break it down and make it familiar to the students.  Difficult class... but prepared me for upper level and grad. science courses!
                
                   Dr. Maurstad is a great professor. You'll learn alot but you have to apply yourself and study your butt off. You will leave the class actually feeling like you learned something from her.
                
                   Easy C...Difficult A.  Depending who great you are with science.  But if you pay attention in class and STUDY the main points for the test, you'll be good to go.
                
                   She is a really good professor.... does not try to be &quot;tricky&quot; at all
                
                   Very good speaker, keeps it interesting. Loved her analogies, helped me better understand material. Study your notes very well and you'll be fine
                
                   No Comments
                
                   she is kool as****..study her notes and you'll be fine
                
                   good teacher.  lots of notes
                
                   No Comments
                
                   You were great Dr. Maurstad.  Thank you!  One of the best Professors you will ever have the pleasure to take in your College life.  Sorry to hear that you might leave our school.  So sign up for her class before she is gone with the wind...Good luck in life and what ever you do...
                
                   After my experience w/a college professor 4 high school bio...I was scared 2 death of this class, but she has a way of lecturing that keeps ur attention & she uses a lot of analogies 2 help ur memory. Final was a bit tricky, but I highly recommend her.
                
                   BAsically if you go to class and take notes, she gives you everything you need to make an A.  Plus she's willing to help you out and gives reviews for all her exams.  If you understand the reviews then there's no reason not to pass.
                
                   Her lectures were so comprehensible and thorough that I hardly had to crack a book.  Of course she probably won't like hearing that.
                
                   shes really good for biology when you really dont want to have to take the course.  i have yet to take her for another course.  i strongly recommend her to anyone.
                
                   This professor is probably the worst professor I've ever had. All she does is read exactly word for word off of the power point and she does not tell you what to study for. She hardly ever answers questions. I would just thoroughly study the power points to pass.
                
                   This class would've been much easier had it not been for the professor's lack of knowledge, lack of engagement with the students, and lack of enthusiasm. She reads directly from the slides, and is not confident in her knowledge of anatomy. If you ask for clarification, don't expect to get a college-level answer. Would highly NOT recommend McLemore.
                
                   Professor McLemore only reads whats on the slides and does not go into detail about what we are learning. She doesn't seem very confident in what she is teaching. She doesn't give out any homework or quizzes, so you need to make sure that you do well on the tests. She also doesn't give out any extra credit. She's pretty boring overall, so good luck
                
                   Reads straight off of the slides and makes exams straight off the slides. Doesn't take attendance and has no homework. SO, not many grades, but exams are easy if you study the slides criteria and the labs. Also, lab grades are easy, pre-labs are bonus points, and practicals are doable if you know the info in pre-labs and slides that say KNOW THIS. 
                
                   I had Joey as a TA  for ecology. He was pretty cool and kind of funny. I like the way he teaches, make it seem very interesting and more understandable. 
                
                   Professor Reustle is an incredible speaker. He lectures to our level of understanding and he makes the information interesting to digest. He also gives great feedback on our papers. 
                
                   She does not explain anything well at all. I took her for professional skills spring 2015. She just isn't clear with what she want, with every assignment I had to ask her to go over in detail.  I would not recommend her at all! This class was suppose to be an easy A without stress and that was not the case. Stress the whole semester. 
                
                   Dr. Alvarado makes you interested in the class he is teaching. Very good professor to take.
                
                   Good Instructor.
                
                   I took Mariculture the first semester Dr. Alvarado taught it.  Hopefully things have changed since then because the class was fairly useless.  Everything we tried to culture died...there was no textbook, and I remember Dr. Alvarado spending a lot of time reading to us from websites.  Websites&#63;  Really&#63;  Is that a preferred teaching method now&#63;!
                
                   EXCELLENT LEARNING EXPERIENCE. GREAT LAB AND KNOWNLEDGE, DO NOT LEAVE TA&M WITHOUT TAKING ONE OF HIS CLASSES!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a very good teacher, you will learn, and he will get you very interested in the subject. Take him if you can!
                
                   Dr. Kanz expects the best from his students and does not teach "gimme" classes like many of the students wish to have. The subjects he teaches or taught are not simple however if you work and don't cry about it it is possible to get decent grades in his class. I have since received my Ph.D and his courses were the only which taught thinking skills.
                
                   Awesome professor. I learned more in his classes than any others I've taken, including those taken for my PhD.  He makes you think critically, and I credit his classes for the success I've had in science as a professional.  Also, he was more than willing to help after class and explain as many times as necessary for a student to learn.
                
                   Does not know how to teach.  Test are impossible and since 2 of the courses he teaches are required GPA's suffer as a result.  So if you want to go to grad school I suggest you do great in all of your other classes to make up for the terrible grades you will receive in his classes.
                
                   I took Cell, Comparative, and Animal Behavior with Kanz.  I graduated in '03 and now I have nothing but fond memories of Dr. Kanz. His tests can be frustrating, though.  I often had a hard time figuring out what he was asking for in his questions.  The fill-in-the blank questions were the worst!
                
                   the greatest professor ever. in my opinion his test are extreamly unstudy able for but you actually learn something in his class and could teach medicle school when you leave.
                
                   He's awesome.  I've got my PhD now and I look back at Kanz classes as the only ones that really taught me anything at all in college.
                
                   Dr. Kanz is a nice man but he grades on the Phd level. if you take any of his classes record the lecture. always take the figures to class with you. Memorize everything! He loves to talk about sex and fruit fly's. Learn the figures inside and out, and know how to draw them. Don't take evolution if you dont have to.
                
                   All his classes are pretty hard. pretty insane tests, like one was a crossword puzzle written in martian. I wish i could have retained more his classes are most useful in the real world, believe it or not.
                
                   hes easy guys hello his whole class is just regurgitation so get the notes and memorize them if you can do that you will pass with a b or c anyone that says this class is not passible without stress obviously either tried to understand it to deeply or cant memorize well ive taken every course he has offered and just memorize two nights before
                
                   Tests are hard, but his lectures are hilarious
                
                   WHY FIGHT IT&#63; YOU HAVE TO TAKE CLASSES WITH HIM, TRY YOUR BEST ALTHOUGH YOU MIGHT NOT LEARN MUCH. 466 IS AN EASY CLASS! THE OTHER TOO HAVE TOO MUCH INFORMATION BUT HE LIKES TUTORING!
                
                   He's great. Lectures are entertaining, although passing is...difficult. Of course it doesn't matter, you have to take him multiple times if you are a MARB. Extremely smart man, a crazy prof. if you will.
                
                   Tests are weird and hard, but he is an awesome Prof
                
                   I love Dr. Kanz. . . He is one of the only instructors that makes us earn our degrees. . .  I salute you Kanz. . . I will remember you forever!!!
                
                   Kanz is never going to be fair, he is never going to give honest exams and he is never going to care.  However, if you take one of his elective classes, especially in the summer, he is a much better instructor.  The key to passing his tests is to think as dirty and ****ed as he does, especially on the question you get to write and answer.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He also teaches MARB 310, and Marb 420. Take MARB 360 with DR. Knox she is a good teacher. Dr. Kanz is the worst teacher I have had in my life, he is unfair, and you will get a C in the class not matter how hard you try.
                
                   Very enthusiastic and interesting teacher.  Knows his stuff.  Best labs ever.  You actually apply what you learn in lecture to real life situations.
                
                   Very interesting. Makes learning fun. I wish he taught all my classes.
                
                   Best class ever
                
                   VERY INTERESTING CLASSES, IT'S UP TO YOU WHAT PRIORITY YOU GIVE THEM. BASICALLY SHOW UP AND DO GOOD. TEACHER IS VERY HELPFUL. ALSO VERY FULL OF HIMSELF, HE HAS A REASON THOUGH... &quot;BEING FAMOUS&quot;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His vert class is said to be the hardest for marb majors. It's impossible to pass the exams without exams from previous semesters (he doesn't give back the final tho) bc theres lots of material. He will tell you what the essay will be in class if you pay attention. PRACTICE WRITING THE POSSIBLE ESSAYS!! 
                
                   Class wasnt mandatory but is crucial in passing the class. He puts his lectures online so you can listen to later. Previous exams that you get from other students are REALLY helpful and is the reason why i did so good in the class. The notebooks in lab are easy points to get so do them well!
                
                   Make sure to attend every class. In the lab get an early start on the lab notebooks. Make sure you do the reviews!!!!
                
                   This is an amazing class.  Dr. Marshall is really interesting and you will learn lots.  The tests are hard; make sure and memorize all the cladograms.
                
                   He seems to love the class, WHATEVER YOU DO GO TO HIS REVIEWS THAT IS THE DIFFERENCE IN PASSING! also get old tests from people to study it makes a world of difference.STUDY REALLY REALLY HARD for his first test most don't make over a 40 on it and it screws you the rest of the semester, that is what gets most ppl. learn phylogenic trees! pickytests
                
                   I really enjoyed this class! Dr. Marshal makes it very entertaining. The old test are very similar.
                
                   This is a great class. Dr. Marshall is a great teacher and the lectures are very good. Go to class and you will be fine. There are old tests floating around, they are good study guides just ask around.
                
                   The class itself is a lot of work, but it's very interesting.  Dr. Marshall is an excellent professor and really enjoys teaching this subject.  He always holds review sessions before exams and is willing to help students outside of class.  He also makes the class interesting by acting out the material so you can remember it.  Very fun guy!
                
                   Great class - very useful information for other biology classes.  This professor gave really interesting lectures and ALWAYS held review sessions.
                
                   Very willing to help outside of class.  Will go over any subject as many times as you need to until you understand.  A fairly hard class but if you actually study and not blow it off then you will do fine.  He wants you to pass and will help you pass.  I found it to be a very interesting course.
                
                   He is a great prof and very willing to help outside class.  Has reviews for tests and wants to give A's, but you do have to work for them.  Not an easy class, but necessary and a good GPA booster if you try hard enough.
                
                   He is one of the greatest men alive. He is hard but fair. He won't let you do anything but your best. When the chips were down and I wanted to leave, he is the one that made me decide that i wanted to stay, i was a soph then and a senior now...that man is
                
                   He is one of the greatest men alive. He is hard but fair. He won't let you do anything but your best. When the chips were down and I wanted to leave, he is the one that made me decide that i wanted to stay, i was a soph then and a senior now...that man is
                
                   He is a great prof. His vert class is hard but you will learn so much
                
                   I really couldn't stand her classes. She reads power points and gives tests. Too bad the tests don't really go over the power points. Your expected to read and memorize the book and the power points. When there is over 200 slides with 30+ figures it starts to become a joke. The class is boring to start with and the tests make it worse
                
                   I had to drop this class. She reads directly from her slides and also expects you to read every chapter of the book for her tests. 
                
                   First year taking science based classes. She made the transition easy! She loves her students and she wants us to pass, but communication is key. Please get book she will pull from content questions as well. Drops lowest exam, has endless bonus points! 
                
                   Go to class for the bonus points. Otherwise, you're probably better off just teaching yourself. If you know how to read, you can just read her powerpoints by yourself in the comfort of your own dorm, because all she does in lecture is read them to y'all. She drops the lowest test grade.
                
                   Horrible teacher, death by power point, not clear on test material. Makes intro to bio way harder then it should be. My fault is I didn't take the class seriously. Also a chemistry teacher so beware of the 1st test being a straight Chem 1 test.
                
                   Not all the slides are online, you should definitely go o class to get the rest. Study and pay attention and its an easy class.
                
                   Super easy class..showed up half of the time -- you can print her slides, get extra notes from a friend, take the practice tests and make an easy A.
                
                   Easy Class, Easy A.  Get an A and you dont have to take the final.
                
                   Her first semester is ridiculously easy and her second semester isn't much harder. If you don't make an A it's because you didn't try and if you don't at least make a B you might want to rethink going to a university.
                
                   Super easy...tests come straight from powerpoints, old tests are posted online, at least half of the tests come from there. Only reason I went to class was for bonus points. Easy A.
                
                   She was a good teacher. Nice. Never lets us out early though. Very informed about the topics she talks about. Gives a few extra credit quizzes. Gives previous test questions and those questions are usually about half of the exams. For the final, 90 out of the 100 questions were on the practice tests.
                
                   Loved this teacher a lot and the class wasn't too hard for me. My problem was the TA I had. I was in the hospital, missed a lab and wasn't told a few days before the final due date that the lab I missed needed an essay. Luck to you if you have Cortez as your TA because she was none to helpful to me.
                
                   She just reads off the lecture slides. I never went to class, still made an A. Rather boring. Cares more about her sea turtles than students. Her Lab TAs are awesome though, especially Jonathan
                
                   She reads off the slides and everything she says is covered in the textbook. It takes forever to get through class notes because she writes the entire powerpoint on the board. The test are okay. Anatomy was the best part of the semester. This class always gets behind and chapters are always cut from the test.
                
                   Some people seemed to have a problem keeping up with her lectures but I never thought she was moving too quickly. The powerpoints are all online if you miss something. I'd definitely recommend going to class, the random bonuses she gave out made my B an A and exempted me from the final. Study the pre-tests and vocabulary in your notes.
                
                   She reads way to fast from her slides and doesn't give you a chance to finish writing what is on the slides, and if you just study the previous test its like 60% of the questions for the test, except the evolution test. that is just death! I love the bonus points, attend class even though people say not to, it helps! So does the book!
                
                   This teacher doesn't do anything. She reads way to fast for the slides. Most of the answers are from previous test and when she does have original test questions they are very difficult and have information she doesn't cover. The final was easy though because the whole thing was from the previous exams she gives you.
                
                   The test are from old exams. Read the book. She is not helpful at all and even put wrong answers on the test. She does not respond to emails. The bonus points do not raise your grade at all. The final is super easy though.
                
                   All she does is read the slides word for word. Not to mention she goes WAY too fast and when she's not going fast she's standing in front of the projector so you can't see. Unfortunately you have to go to class to get bonus points but that only happens a few times. I used the book to teach myself.
                
                   She's a pretty straight-forward professor. She explains things well. To pass the tests, study the past exams, the powerpoints, and take decent notes. I would not recommend wasting money on the book because you probably won't use it.
                
                   Only 2 tests in this class and 40% lab. Lecture was confusing but if you're having trouble and he knows you go, he will help you out.
                
                   Hard to understand
                
                   He was a little hard to understand and quiet until he discovered the microphone. His tests have a lot of material covered in the lab. So pay attention in lab too. Hardly anyone ever went to class.
                
                   Go over the power points online
                
                   Extremely helful and willing to assist in anyway. The fact that he is gorgeous sure helped my attendance in his class as well.
                
                   sweet
                
                   HE WILL HELP IN ANY WAY POSSIBLE TO MAKE YOU UNDERSTAND. YOU HAVE TO DO YOUR PART, FUN CLASS AND VERY NICE GUY!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   B-E-A-utiful eyes! He is a great teacher. You must work to learn,  but if you put forth the effort it will pay off. He's willing to help you, and provides plenty of extra material. mmmkay&#63;
                
                   The professionalism of Dr. Reich is poor at best. She missed about half of the classes, and was unprepared on the days she did show up. The syllabus changed multiple times, including grading criteria and assignments! not in favor or the student. Totally unacceptable. This class was a tarnish to the quality of A&M university. I WANT MY MONEY BACK!
                
                   Dr. Reich seems as if she's not even interested in teaching the class, half the time she was never even there to teach. The class was completely unstructured, and Dr. Reich was constantly changing material and adding new things that were never explained fully in class or on the syllabus.
                
                   Sea Turtle Biology ended up being a nightmare. Dr. Reich had not taught a class prior to teaching this semester. Half the time she doesn't seem to know what she is talking about. The class was completely disorganized. Claire, the TA, is awesome though!
                
                   Fun class, she hates being up at 8 just like us. Great course, great prof.
                
                   She is nice and funny. Her Aussie accent is always a treat. Really love her class.
                
                   Dr. Wrsig is passionate about the cetaceans he has spend his life studying.  His  enthusiasm is infectious and none who comes to class is immune.  He is funny and laughs at himself until the class is is laughing along.  Anyone who has the opportunity to work with him should jump at the privilege.    
                
                   Absolutely hilarious professor. I was not at all excited for this class until I actually stepped into his class. Quite probably the best professor this school has to offer and a wonderful man in general. I learned a ton in his class and am so glad I took his class. Lectures are very clear and well presented with just enough humor to keep it fun XD
                
                   Really enjoyed this class!
                
                   Dr. Wursig really knows what he's talking about and loves to inform. He definitely is quirky which makes the class more enjoyable! He gives you everything you need to know, but you do need to study because it is a lot of information. I would take him again!
                
                   Dr. Wursig is a walking textbook, and a joy to be around. He makes the course material very interesting, and easy to understand. You will walk away a dolphin hugger for sure :) Woof woof!!
                
                   Wonderful dynamic teacher. Truly delightful. Knows the material. Excited to share. Woof Woof
                
                   Excellent!  Knows more about marine mammals than I know about my belly button!
                
                   Doctor Wursig is the MAN when it comes to Cetaceans. Professor Wursig is off the chain and is a great professor. The MARB 403 class he teaches was interesting and he keeps it fun with tons of jokes especially ones about cetaceans.                     Righty-o, Righty-o    Capital, Capital
                
                   The material is interesting and clear. He keeps the class focused & is entetaining.   Understanding the material is not an issue if you dedicate the time. The challenge is to convey how much you understand! Quizzes & exams are difficult to figure out which response he wants. He will give credit if your answer makes sense. Definately worthwhile
                
                   Great teacher, learned much, now if there was just some way i could apply it.
                
                   Great prof. real funny and the top in his field. The man knows more about marine mammals than i know about the back of my hand.
                
                   Great prof. He's funny and knows so much. If you ever get the chance to take him, do it. Capital Capital, wuff!
                
                   The hardest class I've taken. You really need to study for the tests. She's really fast paced but it's interesting.
                
                   I liked her. It's difficult to understand but if you pay a lot of attention then you'll understand. She is funny and she will make you laugh.
                
                   She is not a really good teacher. She makes things funny but when she teaches, she learns with the class. She's not even a Biology major teaching us Bio. I really didn't like her and I have a D which I never make ever because of her.
                
                   DON'T TAKE
                
                   actually have taken mammalogy, evolutionary theory, and animal physiology with him. he is a tough professor, but it is not a class that is impossible. i constantly hear bad things about him, but those are from 'lazy' students.  don't believe them. his classes are not easy, but you will learn something. no such thing as an easy A in his classes
                
                   Sitting through one of his classes is like watching paint dry..........
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very interesting prof the study skills you learn in his class will only benifit you for others to come. Lots of dry humor and some comments can seem as if he is offending you but don't take it to heart its just fun and games. I recomend taking Baskin for E.theory very intresting class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Unusual yet very interesting and fun guy!!
                
                   He is quite an odd man...at times the dry humor is quite clever and funny. He is an intelligent man; however, he lets it be known that college students are lazy idiots. He might tell you specifically too...but stick with it! He will pass you most likely.
                
                   Baskin is intelligent and will find the answers you are looking for.  Don't blame a professor for a bad grade. Re-evaluate YOUR own study habits.
                
                   this class is way harder than it should be. the class went from 104 to less than half by midterm. i got a C after spending over an hour each day reading and studying all night the night before a test. this was the only class that i really tried in and the only class that i didn't make an A.
                
                   Very dry sense of humor... almost sarcastic...But he is a helpful and good professor that cares about his students.
                
                   GRADES ARE REASONABLE, MAKE SURE TO ATTEND CLASS AND STUDY READ THE CHAPTER AND YOU WILL PASS THE CLASS, ALSO GO TO HIS OFFICE FOR QUESTIONS HE IS THERE TO HELP
                
                   Dr. Escudero is a very cool teacher and grades very reasonable. I would definitely recommend this dude, but don't take his wife's class b/c its hard as heck.
                
                   Poster before me is reffering to Dr Escudero's wife who also teaches. Anyways, Dr Escudero is a very mellow and nice man to get along with. Hes timid when he speaks so sit up front. He gives extra points and curves if you attend class or see him in his office...so DO IT. Labs can be boring but not hard. A no fuss class just do your work
                
                   you have to read your book!  it is a must to pass this micro. class.  she is a new professor so she was a bit unorganized at times, but she does want the students to pass.  Dont cheat because then she stops helping others, or make sure others wont rat on you!  the lab is somewhat interesting because she made it more hands on!
                
                   Dr. Escudero is one of the top three best professors I have ever had in my life. She cares about the students and presents the information in such a way that I am not only fascinated with the material, I retain it. She has taught me more in this semester about immunology than I have learned in all of my other professors' biology classes combined.
                
                   At first when I took her class I was nervous, because I heard it was a very difficult course, however, I just think she is fair, and if you study hard you will get the grade you want. She is very nice and makes class very interesting.
                
                   He's class is boring unless you like science. I swear you can study for days for he's test and still won't pass :(
                
                   He is a nice teacher It was hard to get the material for some but if you study you should be ok he is in his office if you need help. labs help too.overall good  class but you work for the grade which is what your supposed to do anyway :)
                
                   Dr. Garcia is an excellent professor. He made the class very interesting, and it is always nice to have a professor who loves what he does. If you actually study and pay attention, you'll make a good grade.
                
                   You simply show up everyday and listen carefully, maybe even get surprise extra points for it. Power points are available to students so take a little notes on her lectures rather than copy the power points. The book is needed for online work, but can also be really useful for extra understanding of the material.
                
                   Class was great. All the notes are already online for study. Lots of videos!
                
                   Her lectures are VERY monotone & boring. All notes can be printed off her website & she just reads through them word for word. Not an interesting class AT ALL!
                
                   Horrible teacher. First test class average was a 56, second test class average was around a 60, and the last test average was a 54. Not recommended at all for all those that have to take BIO I.
                
                   Great teacher. Enjoyed her class.
                
                   I did not find this class too difficult, I just had a hard time paying attention because for one, I took this class in high school, so a lot of it was review for me, plus she was monotone...which didn't help. She was very informative and helpful, do the study guides and extra credit and you should walk away with a B.
                
                   yes, she is monotone and the class is boring, but if you can stay focused and awake passing is not hard.  she gives review sheets and if you do those you'll do fine.  she is extremely helpful, and if you ask her a question she doesnt know she'll get right back to you the next class.
                
                   Horrible horrible class, she leads you to believe that extra credit and curves can bring your grade up two letters, but that is BS. plus she is monotone and hard to understand. completly disorganized
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Makes his powerpoints available online (or used to), but you still must read the book. His tests are multiple choice, labeling (doing homework can help with this), and essay questions.  A lot of info, so must learn it. The lab is fun once you understand what you have to do. Lab manual is required for its handouts. 
                
                   Explains information clearly and lets you know what's on the test. Do well in Recitation by keeping up the basics of the infonfor that week and you'll do well in the course overall. SI sessions unbelievably long and not worth it, just study notes, powerpoint, and recitation assignments. Excellent professor. Show up on Fridays!!
                
                   Gives you a bunch of opportunities to get a good grade. If you do the Mastering, go to recitation, go to lecture, and do ok on quizzes and tests, it's literally impossible to fail this class. He'll also usually bump up the highest test grade to an 100 so if the highest grade was a 90, there would be a 10 point curve. I wish he was teaching my 1307.
                
                   He knows his stuff and really tries his best to put in terms for students to understand. There are 5 tests and they are a bit tough. He does not give a review, but his notes and powerpoints are pretty clear. He really does not tell you what is going to be on the tests, so that makes it kind of scary, but you do learn a lot. Attendance is KEY.
                
                   Great professor! Lectures were very organized, very straight to the point, and included little interesting facts/stories here and there relating to the topic. The opportunity for extra credit in this class is awesome. If you pay attention, attend class, and take advantage of extra credit, you will definitely get an A in this class.
                
                   Great professor!! The best @ TAMUK.. One of my fav. professors!!! Go to class take notes and you will do good.. He's awesome you will like the classes he teaches..
                
                   Dr. Massa was a wonderful professor and mentor. He was able to provide a large amount of information in a conversational tone. He had numerous interesting stories from his laboratory experience which aligned with the subject of the day.  Drs. Massa, Ballesteros and Gonzalez-Garcia are gems within the TAMUK biology department!
                
                   Great professor, very interesting course you will never get bored. you must study of course but its doable :)
                
                   He is probably one of the best speakers you will ever have for a course. I thought the subject matter was very interesting, and the way he presents it is an added bonus. Never miss recitation, study for the quizzes and tests, read the book, and pay attention in class. You should be fine getting an A if you put in the hard work.
                
                   He is not a trying to make it hard. he does curves in order for you to pass. his test are straight forward. i never used my textbook all you need to do is go to class and take notes. if you don't go to class and take notes then you more likely won't get good grades.
                
                   Amazing teacher! loved him-had him for 1306 and 1307 teaches honors-He loves what he does-class is not boring-he talks about EVERYTHING, it is really interesting, my absolute favorite two classes so far at TAMUK.
                
                   I took Bio 1 honors with massa. It was difficult for me. his tests are hard and tricky. good luck if you take him
                
                   great professor...teaches material well and is actually interesting....study for tests they are kind of tricky
                
                   The material he teaches is very interesting and his exams are insanely doable. However, if you are thinking about attending a professional school, his class will not prepare you. He does not attempt to challenge students. I don't think it is entirely his fault as many student are not willing to try.
                
                   boring
                
                   Great teacher is there to help when needed. Material presented in a clear manner. Test come from the quizzes so study them. As well as study for the quizzes.
                
                   He teaches so well you almost don't need to do anything to pass his tests.  (But make sure you do or he'll bite you in the ass with quizzes!).  You still need to work hard to understand well.
                
                   Dr. Massa is a great teacher. The work is hard, but he shows passion for the subject matter.
                
                   Not really that hard.  Just look for some old exams and go over the packets of notes he gives you and you'll be fine.
                
                   yeah, don't buy the book unless you are really into the whole micro thing.  I liked the class overall.  It wasn't too bad.  Study the old test because they are pretty much verbatim.  I pulled a A in that class.
                
                   Don't waste your money on the book. Your best bet is to find the old test from classmates or others who have taken him. The old test cover 75% of the material on the current test. Plus he hands out powerpoint slide packets.
                
                   Awesome professor! Show up to class and take notes. Lecture is very interesting, and he shares cool stories. SI helps a lot for his classes. He wants you to know your stuff.
                
                   Awesome professor. Go to class everyday and BE ON TIME. Take notes and study those. The tests are a cinch if you study your notes well. He's also very entertaining.
                
                   Good Professor, just follow along with your note taking
                
                   Easy. Take notes in class, that is what the test will be.
                
                   I think people confuse his sarcasm for him putting them down. He makes jokes a lot of the time and some people just aren't always in the mood for it I guess. But he does try to make the content as comprehensible as possible. Not hard if you read the book (he bases his exams off of it). I got an A and have only taken him once, so it's possible.
                
                   This was not an easy class, but I learned a lot. You have to read the book and study lecture notes, but if you put in the time and effort, you should be fine. Also, if you ask him questions, he will answer them for you and explain them so that you understand. He doesn't try to put you down. He really seems to want for everyone to succeed.
                
                   Dr. O is a great professor with great insight and experience in Linguistics. He is the cream of the crop when it comes to Normal Language Development. I've had him for Normal Language, Children's disorders, and Diagnostics and have made A's in all. He has high standards and expects hard work and dedication I love that he remembers me every semester
                
                   READ!! He is an excellent professor, you will learn alot. DONT miss class. If you read his class will not be hard. the test are challenging but if you read you will be fine. people complain so much that he is a bad professor, but as long as you read you can pass his test. his test will not make sense if you dont know the material. you will learn!!!
                
                   Dr. Oller is a good professor. He likes to challenge his students. If you aren't thoroughly familiar with the text you will for sure bomb the exams. He makes the questions somewhat ambiguous for a reason (so he knows for sure you earned your grade, whether it be an A or a D). Hard... but worth it.
                
                   Dr. Oller is an awesome professor and he is helpful when you ask.He makes lecture relate able and easy to understand. yes his tests are very hard be prepared for lots of studying but if you read and do the practice questions you'll do just fine. This is by no means an easy class.
                
                   His class is definitely difficult it's commitment & dedication.If you read the chapters and answer the review questions his exams will make sense. If you need a clarification on something he is always willing to help. Reading once every chapter is not enough at least twice & lecture is a reinforcement to everything you read.
                
                   Dr. Oller is a good teacher.  His lectures are interesting and you can learn a lot.  He has really taken the time to ensure that his tests are fair -- even if they are difficult.  He is tricky in that some topics on the test will not have been mentioned in lecture, rather they come straight from the textbook.  I recommend him.
                
                   Yes, you have to work hard in his class and he has an unorthodox way of presenting material. That being said he is respectful if u show him you're serious. I did poorly on my final from last sem. and he asked me this sem. to come by to go over it. How many prof. do that&#63; Welcome to college where you may actually have to work from time to time.
                
                   He is a narcissist! Everything is about him!Even if you are the smartest person in his class, he will find something wrong and he loves to talk down to students. He always calls himself the &quot;authority&quot; over us. He doesn't encourage you at all and it sucks bc he is the only teacher that teaches certain classes so I have no choice but to take him.
                
                   Avoid taking this professor because even if you are the smartest student he will try everything in his power to make you feel dumb or make you want to quit. I even reconsidered dropping my major when I had a 4.0 GPA but my friends and family told me that a professor like him should not be the example we want to follow.
                
                   DR. OLLER WILL STATE AT THE BEGINNING THAT THE CLASS &quot;IS NOT EASY.&quot; THEREFORE HE EXPECTS ONLY THE BEST FROM STUDENTS. STUDYING IS A MUST, READING IS A MUST, LISTENING IS A MUST. IF THIS IS REALLY WHAT YOU WANT TO DO & WHAT INTERESTS U THEN THERES NO EXCUSE TO NOT PASS! DR. OLLER IS A GREAT PROFESSOR!
                
                   Overall, Dr. Oller is a good professor. Yes, class is mandatory, lectures are lengthy,and tests are worded tricky. However, if you are really interested in the program you should put all of your effort. He clearly states exams are worded to help students with the Clinical Competency Certification. He is willing to help you if have done your part.
                
                   If you take the time to read and pay attention to the lecture you will learn the milestones. He does talk about his family but uses them as examples. The class is difficult to people who don't study. I enjoy his lectures very much.
                
                   They should rename this class &quot;The Life of Dr. Oller&quot; because he gets off topic all the time & talks about his wife and children CONSTANTLY. He's very hard to follow, but if you go to ask for clarification he'll try and make you feel stupid. He's constantly criticizing students but he doesn't even have a degree in CSDO! Avoid taking him if you can.
                
                   Dr. Oller is the worst professor I have ever had.  I did not learn anything and his comments make you feel like you no matter how hard you try to get an education you will not succeed. He is always talking about his wife and kids. I do not recommend him for any classes!
                
                   He has never been an SLP, and doesn't even have a degree in CSDO. He only got the job because of his last name. His lectures are pointless, and he gets so off topic, and ALWAYS talks about his wife and kids. His tests are very tricky. He encourages you to come talk to him, but he always makes you feel stupid when you do. AVOID TAKING HIM!
                
                   He got his PhD from the same university his dad teaches at. He doesn't even have a PhD in speech language pathology but that doesn't stop him from rudely telling people that they shouldn't be in the field. He writes all of his own textbooks, his tests are impossible, and if you ever go to his office hours he'll make you feel like an idiot.
                
                   Very difficult. Dr. Oller wrote the text that's required so naturally he's extremely cocky when it comes to learning the material. Doesn't give reviews. He encourages you to go talk to him but he kind of makes you feel stupid when you do. His tests are badly worded & can be tricky. He has extremely high standards. Avoid if u have test anxiety.
                
                   Lecture is just for fun. Tests hard. MATERIAL HARD!
                
                   Don't take him! His tests covers only half the lecture and half are irrelevant questions! He does curve up some, but not all grades. Overall, don't take him if your grade is really important.
                
                   Didn't go to class. Just recitation. He spent a month discussing the basics and expected everyone to know everything else. Just there for a pay check.
                
                   You have to go to lecture to know what will be on the exams. He will ask the most random questions. Study the powerpoints as well. Over all if you attend lecture and take REALLY good notes and study hard then you should be fine. 
                
                   BIO 1 was interesting with Soto because he makes several sexual references throughout the semester. He reads off powerpoints and seems bored at times. He gives plenty curves at  the end of the semester. DO THE APLIA! It can raise your grade by a whole letter! Overall farely easy if you study the powerpoints as all test questions are from there!
                
                   Took him for parasitology very intresting class. It just requires one to study what you go over in class and you should be able to pull a B. The Lab is fun and easy as well.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Fun prof!! Makes class interesting.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   By the book.  You will definitely have to study alot in this course.  Memorize scientific names and drink lots of caffeine!
                
                   Course was done via web. Lecture is done by watching videos (Thinkwell, you an find them some on Youtube). The lecturer (Dr. Wolfe) on these videos gets annoying pretty quick.
                
                   Fantastic professor who provides feedback and will be as involved in your learning as you want him to be.  He is a very dry man so don't mistake it for not caring or favoritism to other students.  He is the type of professor that you will have to draw out and show your interest to get him to reciprocate.  One of the best professors I have had!
                
                   I have had Dr. Allard for biology, A&P, an upper-level Darwin class,and  Ecology. I am a biology major. I have to say that I strongly disagree with most of these responses. I feel like Dr. Allard is very professional and fair. I think he sticks very well to the subject and has never once mentioned religion. you need to study but if you do you're ok
                
                   He is a good teacher, I liked his class.  He is supportive of student learning.
                
                   We were still talking about the life of Darwin at midterm.  Then we spent the next three weeks talking about religion and science conflicts.  We spent the last two weeks of the semester on actual biology.
                
                   I got an A in his class.  I just pretended I wanted to be a teaching major and then kissed his butt through the whole thing.  Once out of evolutionary I dropped teaching, and took the other prof's courses where you learn something.  He needs to go back to TC where he belongs!  Avoid if you want to learn.
                
                   Worst professor ever.  Gives lecture with his hand over his mouth half the time. Favors teaching majors.  A religious zealot.
                
                   Evolutionary biology.  Don't like him.  If you are a teaching major, you get the bomb.  If you are a biology major, he will screw you over.  very very very bad teacher.  You have to take evolution with him, and you learn nothing but that he favors teaching majors.
                
                   Super
                
                   Dr. Allard is a good teacher. And on a professional level he's good to his students. But he's a little self-righteous when dealing with him on a personal level.
                
                   great teacher, test was very hard! I had him for invert to, it was a blast!
                
                   Extremely nice man. Originally from India, but not too difficult to understand. All tests are online, attendance is not mandatory.
                
                   Great!  I will take him again.
                
                   I had him for general biology and lab as well as genetics. He was by far one of the best professors at that university. He was very helpful when it came to the students. He really wants you to succeed. Take him if you get the chance.
                
                   I took her for A&P I lab. She was very vague when explaining things, and would mostly put up youtube videos on blackboard to help us study. She admits to not being and expert on the subject because i believe she does it part time. I would not take her again for lab. 
                
                   I was appalled when I saw the comments for Dr. Hennessee. Straight up, the students who gave those low scores should probably stop seeking a degree in science, if they haven't already.  If you pay attention in class, read your text, and come with questions, you'll ace. If not, well.. garbage in, garbage out. This isn't highschool. She's fantastic.
                
                   DROP THE CLASS NOW. HORRIBLE TEACHER. ALL TESTS WILL HAVE 7 ANSWERS AND MAYBE THREE OF THEM CAN BE RIGHT. SHE IS VERY UNHELPFUL. SHE WILL MAKE YOU FEEL LIKE YOU ARE AN IDOIT. I LOVE SCIENCE AND SHE WILL MAKE YOU HATE SCIENCE.
                
                   I took her for Evolutionary Theory and she is very rude and condescending. She wanted to make this class as hard as possible for her students. She always talked in riddles and her tests were obnoxious. She had about 7 answers for her questions and it was just overall confusing. I would never ever take her again.
                
                   Very nice and willing to help. She explains things that she expects you to understand very thoroughly and is always happy to explain, re-explain, etc. Very highly recommend!
                
                   I'm guess she's not used to being a teacher because she talks to us as if we're peers in a scientific convention so you really have to pay attention and hope you understand bio lingo. She digressed a lot but for our benefit. I still enjoyed the class and learned what I needed to for my major. It's work but it's uni, not the community college.
                
                   Great as a lab instructor, but lecture was painful. A little disorganized
                
                   Dr. Ross is an excellent Professor! I would absolutely recommend her. Exams were a bit tough but a combination of studying lecture notes, powerpoint videos, and reading the book definitely help. This is upper level science so be prepared to put in effort but she has great clarity and truly cares about her students. Definitely taking her again!
                
                   She is amazing. She is very clear in her powerpoints. The only thing is you have to study the PowerPoint in order to get a good grade on her tests. The test are hard but if you study you should be good to go. She gives extra credit and is always available for help. 
                
                   Dr. Ross is the only professor I like from the Biology department.   You do have to study to be successful in her class.  Keep up with lab notebooks.  Dr. Ross gives you a chance to correct your lab notebook and lab reports.  She will help you whenever you need it but you have to ask.
                
                   Not the easiest course, but the professor is very helpful and gives great explanations. Keep up with the Lab notebook! Tests and quizzes are based primarily off of powerpoint presentations. Study, do your homework and labs and you'll do fine.
                
                   Fantastic professor! Able to explain difficult concepts clearly, and always willing to help if you're struggling. Courses are hard, but that's to be expected at this level.
                
                   LOVE HER! The tests are hard and she grades strict but she is willing to help. The Lab papers are no joke. The first one I had returned I nearly died but she allowed all of us to make corrections to what she marked wrong and resubmit them and have the improved grade replace the bad one. Lab books can be an easy A but dont fall behind.
                
                   She is a wonderful professor. She tries her very best to engage her students in her lecture. She will help you in any way that she can. She's very understanding and will work with you. She does give out a lot of work and her courses are not easy, but it's manageable. If  you study and keep in contact with her you will do well.
                
                   He seemed nice enough, but he never really answered your emails and since it was an online class, that was not helpful. It was an online class, but he still did powerpoints as if they were lectures and it was very hard to understand. I don't know if he would be better in a classroom setting.
                
                   he is confusing
                
                   Honestly I do now know if he is better to take in person than online, but taking this course online was terrible. The test are crazy insane. The assignments are not hard, but your grade depends on your test scores. I took this class    because I needed to take a science class, and this one hit my GPA.
                
                   I got the free trial version of this book online, didn't use it at all. He relies on powerpoint slides. KEEP UP WITH THE LAB BOOK. Take pics during field labs it helps when you interpret data. His tests can range from easy to hard. Short answer can be somewhat difficult, he uses a lot of diagrams. Easy to talk to during office hours.
                
                   Dr. Valdez is one of the most helpful professors I have had. He is approachable and always willing to help. His classes are not easy, you have to study and keep up with work but it is worth it. He may go past time for lectures but it is only because he is so passionate about the topic. I learned so much from his classes!
                
                   Dr. Valdez is great! You learn a lot from his classes, and he is very fair when it comes to grading. You have to study and do work, but if you do that you will be fine in his class. He is always willing to help, and is very friendly.
                
                   This guy is all over the place! He confuses all his classes, grades off others best grade in class. Says he will post quizzes online and forgets. keeps you late. doesn't rely on book to much. He can explain well, and willing to answer questions. Funny accent!
                
                   I took his online Evolutionary Theory class.  He is horrible at communication, his tests are insane, he does not assist you at all, and his grammar is terrible in all of his PowerPoints.  I have never been so frustrated with a teacher before!
                
                   Says the textbook is required. I bought it & never used it. He tests off power points. STUDY THEM! He's really nice & approachable. My only complaints are: 1) He almost always goes over time on lectures. I'm kind of a stickler on punctuality. 2) His exams and quizzes almost always have type-o's. Again, I'm kind of stickler. Otherwise, he's great!
                
                   Dr. Valdez loves his classes. He tends to give lengthy lectures because there is so much he wants to teach you. Sometimes they will get boring. STUDY and do his quizzes! If you need help with class ASK HIM! He is one of the few professors who will make sure you get the most from the class.
                
                   No, no, NO! Shes teaching way too many classes. Too bad shes the onlynprofessor teaching genetics. Dislike her so much. You have quizzes every class. She never teaxhes and if she does she skips through her powerpoints, saying you should know this or look through your book.  Exams are extremely hard!
                
                   No, no, NO! Shes teaching way too many classes. Too bad shes the onlynprofessor teaching genetics. Dislike her so much. You have quizzes every class. She never teaxhes and if she does she skips through her powerpoints, saying you should know this or look through your book. Makes you feel stupid when you ask questions. Exams are extremely hard!
                
                   Horrible professor. I would not advise anyone to take her. She is very hard and quizzes you on material she hasn't even taught yet. When she hands back exams the averages are always 68, in a class of 24 half of the class fails all the time. She gets annoyed when you ask her questions and never answers them. I would advise you to take genetics else.
                
                   Easy A? Think again. Very intelligent and compassionate about her job. She may be taking on more than she can at times. Her life seems busy. I do have a lot of respect for her and will take more courses, even though shes hard life is not always easy folks.
                
                   where 2 start!she is never prepared, wings her lectures everyday, doesnt grade on time, errors & misspells everything on her slides but grades hardcore.she is teaching way 2 many classes than what she is capable of. totally ripping students edu bc she relys on memorization not application. FYI not hot, peps got some bad taste round here.
                
                   Dr. Wise, is  very willing to help students, her tests are tough but she wants to know that each student has truly learned the material. One of the best biology professors I have taken.
                
                   She messes up on exams. She won't provide the answer on multiple choice. Things that aren't gonna be on exams will be on exams, I advise take a tape recorder because you will get lots of, 'you misunderstood me.' She didn't complain about the book or her life this time . careful your grade can be changed. Take genetics elsewhere.
                
                   I have taken her class online and in person. She is definitely more difficult online because it it is a lot of reading and her assignments are chapter summaries. Tests are short answer and multiple choice and are very tricky! She is a interesting and intelligent professor. Enjoyed  all her class :)
                
                   If you want to take a cake walk class, Dr. Wise is NOT for you! She's VERY nice and makes herself available for you but she doesn't make things easy! Her exams and quizzes have some EVIL trick questions sometimes! I feel like I learned so much from her, though!
                
                   Dr. Wise is an amazing professor! She has a passion for her subject that shows in her lectures. Her classes can be hard but you are taking junior or senior classes here. Don't slack off because it will bite you in the butt! Study A LOT! She is always willing you help you if you are struggling so don't be afraid to talk to her!
                
                   Tough but effective
                
                   Probably the easiest A I made for a Bio course. Study the Power Points and this class will be a breeze. Labs are not difficult what so ever. You can earn extra credit for mounting plants and attending lecture and lab. Never used textbook!
                
                   quizzes and tests are off ppt. Memorize the slides word for word and do practice quizzes
                
                   Always available for questions regarding homework, labs, or tests. Academic integrity is important; if you cheat you will not be given a second chance! Homework is extremely beneficial  to making a good grade on the test. Exams are tough but not impossible. If you can explain concepts in a short answer format you are golden, just don't ramble!
                
                   Don't go to class, it's not worth it. Just go to A+ and do your best in lab to learn that material
                
                   Dr. Kemp is a great guy and is extremely willing to help you when you go to him. The tests are typically very straightforward, but a lot of grading errors happened fall 2015. It was frustrating, but he was always there fixing the errors. He just reads off the PowerPoints and talks about his research (which is interesting) but not helpful.
                
                   He doesn't use a test bank. He reads off the slides. I went to every lecture but never paid attention, just did homework. I read the book a little but mostly used his outlines on ecampus. He made his own tests and they had many mistakes. He had to give us bonus points on every test except the final. His tests are basic if you know the definitions.
                
                   Kemp was a cool guy. However, his class was very long and boring. He does not use the test bank anymore (just a heads up). Hardest class I had last semester. His classes are pointless. He skips through a lot of slides but then stays on one for 30 min to tell a story. 2/10 would not recommend.
                
                   He no longer uses a test bank!! He started making his own test questions and they are not worded very well.  He had to give us bonus points on every test because he messed up on the questions. His lectures are boring, he reads straight from the posted slides so no need to go to class. Sucky prof but if you read and teach yourself youll pass.
                
                   Dr. Kemp was an amazing professor and is very passionate about the subject. Everyone says his lectures aren't necessary, but I found the details he went into during class extremely helpful for the exams. For studying, the best way was regurgitation of PowerPoints and THE NOTES HE PUTS ONLINE (the best resource). He's one of the best!
                
                   Dr. Kemp does not teach.  All he does in class is read the slideshows that the book provides. He even tells you at the beginning of that no one will come. However, the tests are not that easy.  You have to study. This semester his tests had a lot of mistakes because he stopped using the the test bank.  If you want to learn bio take someone else.
                
                   Very nice and helpful, but he doesn't use the test bank anymore. He follows the textbook and tests are pretty detailed. Also there is no homework which is nice
                
                   HE DOESNT USE TEST BANKS ANYMORE 
                
                   his lectures are optional. he teaches really close to the book and his tests are basically vocab so read. 
                
                   I ended his class with a 79 and asked him to bump up my grade. He agree, however there was a problem with the grade change and it did not register twice. Three months and a dozen emails later he got it all figured out and I walked away with a B. He may not be the greatest teacher ever but he definitely cares about his students.
                
                   I went to class the first week and it wasn't helpful at all. Luckily I knew someone who knew someone and I ended up getting the test bank. If you know it front to back easies A in the world. Ended up finish with a 95 in there. GET THE TEST BANK
                
                   Kemp uses a test bank which is spread throughout his students, so just ask until you find it.  Kemp is one of my favorite teachers.  Went to class to hear his stories from his research. B is possible with test bank. A is possible with reading and A+ tutor. Lectures online, questions from the book, & SI is helpful. Lab is hard and 20% of the grade.
                
                   I took him, and at first, I really liked him. He's really easy going, and tells a lot of stories. But the more the semester progressed, the more I realized that he DIDN'T teach us ANYTHING. He uses the manufacturer's power points and doesn't go in depth. I Q dropped because he was so unhelpful. DO. NOT. TAKE. HIM.
                
                   Horrible professor. Bio is an important building block class and he doesn't even attempt to teach, just uses a test bank. I Q-Dropped his class because despite the fact I had the book memorized and did well in lab, his generated tests had nothing to do with the book required for the course. DO NOT TAKE HIM.
                
                   Kemp was an awful teacher - taught directly from book generated powerpoints and notes.  GET THE STUDY GUIDE!  It is a "secret" deal and hard to get, so make friends fast and get one.  I couldn't get it until the third test, and failed the first two even though I read the chapters, did EOC questions, study guide, etc.
                
                   He is a great person but not a good professor. I never went to class because I realized he's just reading the PP slides that he puts online anyway. If you're not a science major, just use a test bank.
                
                   GET A TEST BANK! Attendance is a joke, most people don't go to class and still pass. He tells stories and his powerpoints are all online. For the final, all I did was study the test bank and I got 100%. If you want to learn then read the book, if you just want to pass then study the test bank and you'll be fine.
                
                   Pretty much, I only attended lectures to make myself feel better. Kemp tells stories the entire class period. You could pass the class without actually attending the lectures as long as you read over the power points that he posts.
                
                   Walter Kemp was a great professor. If you read and go to class, this class shouldn't be a problem. However, if it is split with Lints, which happened during my semester, I wouldn't recommend. I couldn't stand Professor Lints... she was extremely dry and boring!
                
                   Loved this professor. She is amazing. She is so sweet and isnalways so happy. She loves her students and has a passion for her teaching. I took her for animal physiology and loved it. Her labs are so much fun. Her exams are tough but if you study her power points youll be fine. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND HER!
                
                   I think every once in a while a teacher comes along and just changes your life.  They challenge and inspire. Dr. Wise is definitely one of those professor's.  She is passionate, knowledgeable and always there for you.  She's very tough and always makes you give 100% and wont accept anything less.  That's only because she gives 100%.
                
                   It's a very interesting class. You need the book. Review any slides and all diagrams. It's a lot of information so you have to stay on it everyday. Tests can be tricky, on short answer questions less is more. She looks for key terms and overall concept of the material. Lectures are good, but I didn't take too many notes during that time.
                
                   She's the only one for lecture. She messes up on the exam questions, will be used against you. Things that aren't gonna be on the exam, will be on it. I studied but she's ridiculous. Don't call her out about her mistakes like I did, it will cost you your grade. I had another teacher for the lab for this class & passed. The negative rates are true.
                
                   Dr. Wise is a very enthusiastic professor. She loves the subjects that she teaches and it shows. Her lectures are always interesting. She rarely uses the book except to make her power points. She does go off on a tangent but its mostly something related to the lecture and it's funny. STUDY STUDY STUDY! She is always willing to help!
                
                   I enjoyed her class. Everyone needs a refresher every now and then so going off topic occasionally keeps me interested. Although she is quite tough, she is effective. This is college, not high school. I learned plenty with her.
                
                   She complained about the book she had to use. She goes off topic talking about her personal life & son.  We didn't get much done in lecture because of this. She makes fun of other instructors especially Dr.wayne But unlike her, I learnt something EVEN if his class is hard. Even if a teacher hates a book they can work around it unlike her.  AVOID!!
                
                   she actually cares about your grade
                
                   She was very honest, fair, and prompt when contacted outside of class. Instilled the desire to do well in her class. You could tell she cared about the student's understanding of the material and how they were doing in the class in general. First lab instructor to actually dissect the cat with you and will guide you through the various tissues.  
                
                   She really cares about your education and it shows. She's one of the best instructors I've had at TNCC
                
                   She is a very nice person.  At times appears confused during lectures, especially when asked to clarify info.  Needs a little more practice teaching.  Lots of extra credit.  Read chapter before class.  Be prepared to do a lot of writing she does not like to post power point lectures on BB.  
                
                   If you love plants you'll get along well. No matter what class he's teaching he loves plants and his emphasis is more on plant life rather than animal life. I'm pre-med so have no interest in plants. Tests are difficult but if the class puts forth an effort he'll work with you. Be sure to take notes and study slides!
                
                   Great teacher! Also took her for Evolution. Tests are multiple choice and be sure to study powerpoints. She will sometimes provide a study guide that will help you figure out what to study in the book. She sometimes gives opportunity for extra credit.
                
                   Smart.  Cares about students.  Very cool with the military
                
                   she's straight forward and tells you what you need to study for a test. The power points are what she uses on the exam and sometimes the book or videos. I'd take her again if she was teaching a class I needed.
                
                   He taught almost all of the courses because we only had one professor in the major.  He cared about us.  Allard only likes teaching majors and preaches religion in evolution.
                
                   good overall
                
                   The ecology class was pretty hard this fall.  Mainly because he made us read Biodiversity outside of class there was a 20 pt SA on each test.  The lecture material is not that bad if you study, but if you don't read the exta readings you will get slammed on the test!  All of his classes are this way.  Make sure your read the book!
                
                   Wildlife biology and wildlife techniques.  I attended this course this summer.  He is a great lecturer and had very fun labs.  We don't have this class at my college, and our professors are not this good.  Some students didn't like him, but most of these were getting bad grades and didn't study.
                
                   The test was VERY HARD, but it wouldn't have been if I had studied the notes and slides!!!  It was all there!!!!  Test was staight forward but you had to know the stuff!  Labs have been great.  This is his first semester here and I think he has never taught this course before.  Great sense of humor.  Batman Rocks!
                
                   has no sense of time.makes you feel as if your the one at fault. no priorities. not trust worthy. has really good exuses and can back himself up and change others minds. needs to be removed from office.
                
                   Dr. Velez is an amazing professor who makes time for her students and is incredibly helpful. She is open to question and discussion on the topic. Things in her class are not boring and she gives everyone a fair chance to participate and be involved.
                
                   Dr. Velez is one of the best professors on campus. Her lectures are clear and easy to understand and she welcomes questions. She is very knowledgeable in her subject area and goes out of her way to make sure her students understand. You do have to study if you want pass her tests or her weekly quizzes. Overall, I would recommend her to anyone.
                
                   Your grades are not the responsibility of the professor.  There is no fate but what you make for yourself.  I got an A in his class, the old fashioned way: not whining, but working
                
                   Does not help the students at all.  Does not provide enough information about what will be on the test.  Tests focus on little details.
                
                   He's really sarcastic and thinks his way is the only way. Really hard. He doesn't provide enough  supplements to help prepare for exams
                
                   Professor Powell is a very interesting guy! He keeps the material fun with stories about places he's been and random facts he's learned. Even though attendance is not mandatory, I would still encourage a student to attend the lectures. He tells you what to study. Also, pay attention to the apples on his slides! "Core points"
                
                   A very good professor. He keeps every topic in perspective and relates it to everyday life. He is very easy going and very approachable. If you have ever had a class in the Biology department, he is the embodiment of the light, almost playful atmosphere of the whole department. I HIGHLY recommend taking a class with him: you will not regret it!
                
                   Dr. Powell's class is lively.  In addittion, he  provides the class with detailed powerpoints, that are helpful in learning the material in conjunction with reading.
                
                   Great professor! I recommend any student to take his class.   He is organised and together.
                
                   He is a great speaker and makes class very interesting. He is also easy going and approachable.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   turn OFF your PHONE before you go to class. He'll take it away from you infront of everyone or ask you to leave. Aside from that, very good professor and clear when he speaks. Great to get along with. Exams are hard unless you do your work and read. spending 8 hours or more on each chapter individually to verse yourself should be good enough.
                
                   he is very boing and hard to listen to. attendence is not required but he gives quizes when no one shows up i dont recomend him to anyone
                
                   Dr.Pledger is an awesome professor. His class is a bit difficult but he emails u typed outlines 4 u to study. He's available online & during office hours. Runs 1-3 mins. late at times. Don't we all&#63; Yet always there. He's  not a baby sitter, if ur a baby stay out of his classes. Lots of extra credit thats a plus. Works with u, just ask.
                
                   Great professor. Study notes and figures and you'll pass. Lab which he does not teach, suks. I Love you Dr. Pledger...you can talk about Biology to me anytime..LOL. ummm guess not...im not a biology major.
                
                   Great Professor. Emails outlines so you can listen to his lectures. Study the  outlines and figures he tells you to study and you will pass your exams. Lots of extra credit. Available during office hours and by email. Have any questions just ask him.
                
                   His tests are ridicuous!  Speaks well in class and also gives out notes.  However, you have to study the details.
                
                   Very interesting and also very helpful.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he's a great teacher and explains material throughly. He gives u class notes typed up so that u can listen to his lecture in class! all u have to do is study your notes and you'll do great on the test! plus there's plenty of extra credit opportunities! he actually is on your side!one of my favorite teachers!
                
                   The material is not easy, but he gives you the notes. the tests are pretty much over the notes. very good about helping one on one.  if you study the notes youll do fine. just go to class! Lab is another story though....
                
                   she sucks
                
                   a whole lot of reading to do for the class.  tests are extremely hard even if you read, but she does curve grades....a lot!  she knows a lot about plants, but not much of the other material.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He has 11 test, one a week, plus a final and drops the lowest grade. Test are 100% from the lectures so you have to go to every class. Just write down everything he writes on the board and study right before the test and you should make an B at least.
                
                   You have to go to every class and write down EVERY word he says during lectures. The weekly tests are directly from lecture. He takes attendance and considers it when final grades get posted. I would not take him again, just due to the fact that his testing is so incredibly specific. 
                
                   One of my absolute favorite profs of all time. He is very intelligent and really knows what he is talking about. I like him so much that I am actually taking more classes from him. The way to pass his class is to just show up and write what he writes. He uses the blackboard so i suggest sitting near the front.
                
                   Professor Wardle is the best biology teacher I have ever had. He is through on his notes and very helpful if you have questions. I enjoy his class and I have gained a lot of knowledge. Highly recommend taking him if he is available.
                
                   This professor is amazing! You can tell he loves his job and loves to teach. Just study the lecture notes that you took during class and you will be fine. He is a great teacher!
                
                   Lectures are understandable and clear. Drawings and diagrams are rarely on the test. If you take descent notes and look over them before every weekly test you will do fairly well. Work a tiny bit harder and you have an easy A. I learned a lot and    it wasn't painful at all. I recommend him.
                
                   I could of made a A but i really didn't try that hard. if you study his lecture and take great notes you will make a A on every quiz. Lab is harder than lecture
                
                   THe guy pretty much is in love with biology. you can tell he is very passionate. no test over several chapters-he does one each week over the prev weeks stuff so no reason not to make a good grade. final is not comprehensive! he can be unclear at times and i wouldnt worry about copying down his drawings. they get messy and aren't on test.
                
                   He explained everything very well and made it easy to understand. You have to go to every class in my opinion and he gives short 10 min tests every week. It is better to know the info instead of memorizing it.
                
                   EASY CLASS, LOTS OF MEMORIZATION BUT NOT HARD AT ALL. HE LOVES THE TOPIC AND IS VERY HELPFUL! AND I THINK THERE ISN'T ANOTHER CHOICE.
                
                   AWESOME CLASS, IF YOU REALLY WANT TO LEARN HE WILL BE VERY HELPFUL! ENJOY THIS COMES IN HANDY IN THE FUTURE!
                
                   I took Invert in 2001 and loved it!  It was extremely stressful, though and I'm definitely glad I only had to take it once. (I made an A, but I worked hard for it.)  I agree with the previous post that it's 2 semesters worth of material.  I later took another invert class in grad school and it was a piece of cake after Harper's class!
                
                   Okay, I took invert a couple of years ago, and yes it was HARD. Made a C my first try.  Learned more in that class than any other at TAMUG.  Now a grad student elsewhere and profs here know his reputation and respect my C.  I pity those of you who got away without having to take Invert...BIG loss on your part if you seriously want to be in the fiel
                
                   Some how the man finds time to cram 2 semesters worth of material into 1 semester. Most people take it twice. I guess the math works out.
                
                   i study every darn day all the time and still barely pass he is not helpful often when you ask him question he answers as if you asked a dumb question he treats you like you already know the stuff his test are ridiculous im glad he is leaving excellant researcher but horrible teacher
                
                   Excellent prof.  Hard and challenging but very helpful.
                
                   DO NOT LISTEN TO RUMORS... IF YOU STUDY YOU WILL PASS! IT'S ALOT OF MATERIAL BUT IT'S DOABLE. HE WILL LOVE TO HELP AND IS VERY CLEAR WITH ALL THE MATERIAL.
                
                   He made the class interesting. There was never a dull moment.
                
                   Dr. Harper teaches his classes at a graduate student level.  He grades tests multiple time to get the average he wants and works hard to use the worst specimens for practicals.  Best thing to do is get old tests, visit him often during his office hours to ask intellegent questions, AND STUDY YOUR A** OFF!
                
                   Extremely difficult class, but well worth it even if you come out with a C!
                
                   Although he knows his stuff and is clear in his explanation (apart from talking fast) he gives way to much information and expects to to remember all of it all year with comprehensive tests and no multiple choice
                
                   I thought his class was very interesting and he seemed to prepare us better for Vert and other classes than the prof that teaches it now. His tests were a little hard but he really wasnt all that bad of a prof
                
                   the only positive thing i can say is that he is an arrogant sarcastic witty ****, god damn! didnt learn anything really and hardly went to class...made a C by the grace of god. good luck passing.
                
                   the only positive thing i can say is that he is an arrogant sarcastic witty ****, god damn! didnt learn anything really and hardly went to class...made a C by the grace of god. good luck passing.
                
                   he may have been a crazy hard prof. but damn he was sexy
                
                   Didn't show up in class half the time but still made a C.  All the lecture notes are posted on Webct for viewing.
                
                   slept in class all semester and woke for pop quizes. relied on ap bio notes from high school for concepts, and studied the book the night before the exams to learn details (most of the test). made a C - barely.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Unhelpful and condescending.
                
                   There was a lot of material provided-too much to really digest.  Organization was good on topics, but not as consistent synthesis
                
                   He was awesome, super open to questions and is super happy about fish. Fun class. 
                
                   You have to teach yourself the book and think outside the box when it comes to her tests. You have to really apply all the information you learn from the book to get her questions correct. Lots of details and she will test you on the things you think she wouldn't ask. Got an A but worked REALLY hard for it.
                
                   Amongst the Worst science professor this school has to offer. Take her class and you'll likely get a C, if you're lucky you get a B. This is one class where no matter how much you study, you always do poorly on the exams. She completely sucks.
                
                   She is far from an easy professor. You really have to read the book, and to some degree, teach yourself immunology. In lecture, she tells you what you need to know but the vast volume of information requires a TON of time spent outside of glass. This isn't highschool, you are responsible for your own education. Do the work, get the A.
                
                   Can not understand her. Not talking about her speech but just the way she teaches is boring. I wanted to sleep in her class. The test are brutal and I read every chapter and fail with a D. She sucks.
                
                   I think the people who gave her good reviews were confused with some other teacher. I WOULD NOT TAKE HER AT ALL. She cannot teach and only reads off her power points. I would study my brains out and make my own notes and still only make a 50 on the tests. Outside of class she was ok and even funny, but being in her class is very confusing.
                
                   TERRIBLE teacher! Stay away from this class. You cannot understand her NO matter how close you sit. She reads directly off the powerpoint and NOTHING more! Does not help prepare for test. The review is just the powerpoints she already went over. No willingness to change anything to make things better!
                
                   very hard to understand. I would go to the class with the chapter read and leave very confused. Al l she does during class is read off her powerpoint, which are on WebCt. She does take role and quizzes, so attendance is mandatory. I had to drop this class. I have talked to others, and they are in the same boat. I would not recommend her to anyone!
                
                   You can not understand anything she says. She reads directly off the powerpoint and when you ask questions it seems almost like she has no idea how to answer them. Stay away from her class.
                
                   Very hard to understand and not very approachable.  She teaches like she's talking to a grad-school student.  I got a C in her class and I was just taking an elective!
                
                   Very hard to understand and not very approachable.  Teaches as if she's teaching a grad class.  I wouldn't recommend her, I got a C in her class, and it was just an elective!
                
                   Very difficult to understand and not easy to get help from or get ahold of.  Deffinantly thinks she's teaching on the grad-school level.  I would not recommend her and got a C in an elective for her class!
                
                   She is extremely attractive and her class was easy.  A+.  Learned so much.  Thanks Prof. Walbeser!
                
                   Listen to the other reviews, nice lady but bad bad bad teacher.  Tests suck, questions come from other books, however old tests are in the TLC so that may help some.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Waldbeser is very hard to undertstand, not because she has a bit of an accent, but because she doesn't teach her material well. She will show a whole powerpoint presentation each class and read off the slides word for word. The slides can be found in the textbook. She also gets very much into detail making it difficult for students to understand and will jump to another subject the next class. That makes it hard to soak everything in. If you want to pass Biology, read the book, her class is for sleeping.
                
                   She's aweful.   She just reads off of the powerpoints that she posts on webct.  But she still takes roll and demands that you be in class.  And Agonizing hour and a 1/2.  She's not meant to teach freshmen, thats for sure.   She thinks she's teaching upper grads.  She also cares more about her research than anything.   One day she came in pretending to be sick,  then later some students went to her room to talk to her and a note on her door said she had gone to work on her research.   Bologna!
                
                   Do not take her!! I did not learn anything in there, and if I did I learned it all by myself! Everything about her class sucks!
                
                   Average test scores in the 30s. Lectures are worthless, unless as a cure for insomnia. Avoid avoid avoid!
                
                   Very hard to understand! She puts things on tests that were not covered, almost everyone fails her tests horribly. AVOID.
                
                   Worst teacher ever!  Seriously, she knows what she is talking about, but no one else has a clue.
                
                   She is very nice and always willing to help. The material isn't always easy but she makes it interesting to learn.
                
                   She is awesome. Willing to help in any way and is so nice. she was the only good experience in Biology.
                
                   I think that Dr. Posey is an awesome professor who really enjoys what he does. He is highly intelligent and teaches at a good speed. He uses Power Point slides all the time, I don't think we used the book at all.  Very interesting class.  Fun.
                
                   very easy class he is also very helpful definetly recommend this class!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Even though I got a good grade in this class it was really hard and I only really felt like I learned from the labs. Her powerpoints were really long and repetitive. The only part that made this class enjoyable was the lab but besides that the class was really hard. The only reason I did good was because she gave extra credit at the end. 
                
                   Her powerpoints don't follow the book very well.  When asked a question she says we will come back to it in a later section.  There is a field trip which is nice.  There is  a lot of information about the different time periods in the history of life's evolution that you should remember because the test ask questions about what evolved when.
                
                   Dr. Mckee is one of best professors I had at TAMUCC. Really cares about the students and that learn the material. Have to memorize taxonomy but isn't a unreasonable amount. Test comes directly from notes and taxonomy
                
                   He is a great professor. His classes take some studying but he is more that willing to help, and has great anecdotes to almost everything.
                
                   One of my favorite professors. Tells awesome random stories, always explains things really well and is just in general a really nice guy.
                
                   blahhhhhh
                
                   At first, I had a hard time getting to like her. However, after going to her office hours and actually staying to get to know her, I found her to be VERY helpful and friendly. She will be very understanding in any circumstances and I found her emails to be very helpful when I needed help. 
                
                   Taken SSI. Be prepared to compact a semesters worth of work into one month (20+ CH.'s, assgn./quizzes/HW/ everyday). Print all PP and take good notes. Do review, they help a lot. Dr. Kutil is very helpful and WANTS her students to learn. The book is a must for supplemental understanding. Nvr miss class/DO the wrk/STUDY! I got the A. Its possible.
                
                   When it comes to emails, she really never replied. Very full of herself. Kutil also is very rude when it comes to critiquing students. Never explains assignments clearly.
                
                   Kutil was one of the best professors I have ever had. She is extremely clear. I had her in the summer and you do have to show up everyday, but if you put in the work you will do great and will retain the information. Thats what I liked the most, she teaches for your benefit, and what you learn really is used in future courses. Great prof!
                
                   I was so glad I took genetics during the summer from Kutil after having dropped from Dr. O. The class is very fast paced and you should not try to take any other difficult course at the same time. you will need to study hard to make a good grade. she is very willing to help out and answer questions all the time. She is a really great teacher.
                
                   I swear &quot;tough love&quot; is her motto. She is extremely helpful with anything you ask, but seemingly critical as well. In the end, if/when you do well on your project, it's like all of her criticism and brutal comments were worth it.
                
                   Great professor! You must work hard but it will all pay off! She is extremely helpful and bright.
                
                   She teaches freshman seminar. Pretty good teacher. Would probably take her again.
                
                   Although he's relatively cute, this class is completely uninteresting; a total waste of time and money. He grades tough, so don't expect to get out of this &quot;blow off&quot; class completely unscathed.
                
                   Was the lead TA for Microbiology...I'm not sure if he still is. Pretty cute, super hard on grading.
                
                   Joshua Haslun conducts the best labs! He's so dreamy!
                
                   Makes class interest with his stories..I learned more from him than I did from my actual biology lecture professor
                
                   He is nice, but sometimes hard to understand.  Test usually do not seem to cover the material you study, just the review he gives.  Overall easy A
                
                   Entertaining teacher.  Very fair.  Class isn't hard if you'll actually bother to read the book.
                
                   He really is not a bad teacher he just has problems bringing it to students levels. He can go off on tangents and is sometimes hard to follow but, hes not to bad.
                
                   lee, what can i say; he gets off on tangents more often than not.  always talks about his personal life in class which is great if the test asked those types of questions. seems to favor his jamp students, yes they do make good grades in there other classes however they also get the same special treatment in them too.  dont take
                
                   The worst teacher ever.
                
                   He is probably THE WORSE professor in the Biology department. You might have a possibility of getting an A in his class, only if you become one of his pets. Otherwise, you will get a B or a C (it doesnt matter how hard you work) And he likes to talk about ethics how ironic!!
                
                   VIVA LA LEE!!!
                
                   To anyone (like Joe LeSarge) who thinks that the Jamp workers are shown favoritism, maybe they should check out the grades the Jamp workers make in other classes.  Dr. Lee is a damn smart microbiologist.
                
                   Never will I be able to find out how to study for his classes.  NEVER!!!
                
                   THe only people who recieves &quot;A's&quot; in Dr. Lee's class are Kristy's (Dr. Lee's secretary) workers.  Have you noticed, that they are the students who always make the highest grades on his test.  And he calls himself a man with high morals and ethi
                
                   He speaks on things that don't relate to the class a lot of the times. Also, he speaks a lot on ethics but personally I don't feel that he is very ethical in his grading unless you are an &quot;A&quot; student. He was really no help to me at all.
                
                   If you just read in his class you will do fine and write down everything that he says! He is a wonderful guy and he makes me laugh. He is always willing to give extra points and encouragement
                
                   The man is way cool!  All of his little stories make the information more memorable and easy to relate to real life.  I wish I could say the same for all my other science professors!  I would recommend him to anyone who asked.
                
                   hard to stay awake
                
                   Dr. Lee, why do we need to know about your cows!!!!!!!!&#63;&#63;&#63;&#63;  But its good you talk about ethics!
                
                   Very Sketchy...rambles incoherently
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's a very good teacher. Tests are challenging. it's not a cakewalk. I learnt a lot about infection diseases and viruses. It is perfect course for pre-med students!
                
                   Great professor! If you want to learn Genetics and Cell Biology, take his class; provides live interactive lectures and follow active learning methods. He can take complex matters and simplify it; passionate about science and care about student learning. Although his tests (especially multiple choice) were very hard, I learned a lot.
                
                   He really is not a bad teacher he just has problems bringing it to students levels. He is sometimes hard to follow but, he is not too bad. If you just read in his class you will do fine and write down everything that he says! He is a wonderful instructor and he makes me laugh. He is always willing to give extra points and encouragement
                
                   One of Biology class at TAMUC, in which I didn't learn anything from the instructor, essentially I have to learn myself the entire course. Although I got an "A," I feel like I didn't earn it; what a waste of time and money.
                
                   I really enjoyed all of his lectures and he is very funny. He makes learning the material fun and he is very knowledgeable in the subject. I want to note his tests are not difficult if you just briefly read his powpoint lectures.
                
                   Botany and Cell Biology courses have been my favorite classes at Texas A&M University, Commerce.  Dr. Andrei Kochegarov is a fantastic lecturer. If you curious to know how life originated, how earth looked 400 million years ago you should take these courses. Although attendance is not mandatory, but you will NOT pass the tests if you do not attend 
                
                   This is a great professor, probably one of the best I have had at A&M. This class helped me realize how exactly biology comes into play in my life, and that's something I appreciate. He really cares about student learning and takes time to help you.
                
                   It would be a better course if there was more in depth explanation on subjects that we need to know. Less teaching directly from power points.
                
                   Andrei was funny, and seemed to generally like the students.
                
                   This genetic course was just amazing! The instructor did very in helping me correct my mistakes on exams. Provided A LOT of information, easy to talk to in office hours. 
                
                   We ended up covering around eight extra chapters that would be fine if he explained things better. Make sure the instructor at least vaguely, somewhat follows his syllabus. I felt so horrible nearly the entire semester
                
                   BSC304  Genetics 2014 The lectures and slides were over way informative. Condense material than having 80 PPT slides (in chapter 18), for tests there would be over 150 slides of information to memorize. Cut it down!
                
                   He always returned test grades quickly, which is much appreciated. You could also tell that, even though he was a new teacher, he tried to help you be successful. I personally was struggling immensely in this class, but he was more than willing to listen and tell me how I needed to do for the rest of the semester to get a certain grade.
                
                   I could never imagine before how exciting may be Genetics. I enjoy solving genetics problems, as well as learning modern molecular biology and spending time in the laboratory doing Bacterial Transformation, Plasmid Isolation, Agarose Gel Electrophoresis, Restriction Digest, PCR and many other techniques. This class is cool!
                
                   I was really disappointing in Dr. K. I heard a lot of great things about him, but he  only taught 1 out of every 4 chapters we had to read. I was really excited to learn about ecology, but I think I learn more watching BBC nature shows. Exams were ok, all I did was read the night before and of course now I don't remember anything.
                
                   I liked his online evolution graduate class and learned tremendously. Very significant writing occurs as well as a research paper. The only problem is multiple choice quizzes for every chapter. I believe a graduate class should involve less of that multiple choice and more of the important and significant learning. I recommend this professor!
                
                   Took Behavior and Conservation (graduate level) course and was disappointed by the amount of work required.  The class consisted of weekly 5 page papers discussing the chapter and supplemental reading assigned.  In addition to, weekly chapter test, a mid term, comprehensive final, and a 10 page article review.  Ridiculous amount of work!!!
                
                   Took him for ecology. good for commerce I suppose, but I left because the town is horrible...but.more interting than most. grades lab reports very hashly but does teach you to be a decent scientific writer..tests are quite challenging..pretty much have to memorize notes. good luck!
                
                   Very talented man. He knows what he is talking about. very interesting class
                
                   Very very good.
                
                   this is a great teacher with a witty sense of humour! he gives detailed notes almost each class, but sometimes you will just watch a film.  DON'T BUY A BOOK!! he doesn't use one.  his tests are straight from the notes and fairly difficult, so go to class and STUDY!
                
                   Hard tests and lots of notes-but GREAT teacher and really cares about students.
                
                   Took a capstone class called Our Endangered Planet.  It has to be the easiest capstone offered.  All we did was watch movies all the time.  The movies were pretty depressing, but you get used to it.  I think we had to write two 6-8 page papers that were easy.  We had to write a ten sentence journal every week, which you could write about anything you have talked about in class.  He does give a lot of reading assignments, which you will be quizzed over, but they were all true/false.
                
                   The Best
                
                   One of the best teachers of the Biology department.
                
                   Study, study, study.  Very good prof., funny, great teacher, but you HAVE to study or you will not do well.
                
                   He is a great teacher.  A little nerdy and likes to laugh at his own jokes, but he is still a great teacher and is very approachable.
                
                   Dr. K is very funny and an easy going kind of guy.He always tries to make the class funny so that you can have a good time in class.He is very helpful, if you just go to him for help, he would do anything for you.  He has been one of my greatest profs.
                
                   If you study you will pass. However, if you are not doing so well and ask for help he will help. But don't be mistaken to think because you asked for help that you will pass, he does not take this into consideration.
                
                   one of the best lecturers on campus.  i wish he teaches all the biology classes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   One of the best instructors I ever had.Has a great personality and she is very helpful.
                
                   She is one of the best teacher in the biology department. She is extremely helpful.
                
                   Wonderful professor, pretty easy course if you go to lectures, read the chapters and study.
                
                   I love Doyce! He is a great teacher, but you have to work for your grade. He will stay late and help you study, and trust me you will need it! If you read your book and show up to class you should be able to make a B- easy, but you have to put forth quite a bit of effort to get an A. 
                
                   GREAT teacher. He is there to help at any time! Don't be afraid to ask questions in class, he will answer any question you have. SHOW UP!!! Lectures are easy to understand, quizzes and tests are easy and straight-forward. Always read chapters and know vocabulary.
                
                   FANTASTIC teacher!!! He really moves you! He makes a difference in your life and he has a huge passion for his subject. Stays to help till 11 pm everyday! Just show up and try. He's tough but wants you to learn!
                
                   Professor focuses a lot on histology and not on the more important things regarding A&P. Tends to get hung up on the small details rather than focusing on the big picture.
                
                   You have to read the text book or you will get lost.
                
                   Hard but fair.  Very detailed.  Poor computer skills.  Needs to learn how to put up a website.  There's way too much to learn in this class.
                
                   She is really sweet and very passionate about geology. I found this class very challenging. Tests and quiz questions were primarily over lecture notes, but not all. Spent many days studying many hours for tests and still wouldn't do the best. The worst part is she never passed tests or quizzes back so we were completely blind to how we were doing.
                
                   To be honest, she's a great person. She seems like she knows what she is talking about. She won't be precise on exactly what you need to study so you might study something different than whats on the quizzes and test. She hardly ever does multiple choice so please study, or you will definitely fail her class.
                
                   Weekly quizzes are based off the power points that the instructor provides. The weekly lab assignments are rather confusing because the instructor is not always clear what we must complete and submit. To get in contact with her you can try sending multiple emails until she replies. Or try the virtual office. That's faster. 
                
                   Great lab assignments!  Content was interesting and easy to understand.  Mostly organized and straightforward.  One of the better classes I've taken through the university.  Always quick to respond to emails and questions.  Quizzes straight from the book info.
                
                   Had her for online Earth Science. Extremely slow grader, power points are helpful, test are crazy. Hard to get ahold of.
                
                   She is nice but has no clue what she is teaching. Tests are hard it seems like she makes them for science majors. She is trying to teach us how to teach kids but she can't even teach us correctly.
                
                   I really liked this teacher, she knows her stuff!  She is hard when it comes to tests but its nothing that she hasn't taught.  She does read from her ppts but then she talks about whats on them.  She does not give reviews but since the tests come directly from the ppts you already have the info.  She really helped me prepare for higher level class.
                
                   She teaches from powerpoints and makes you write the information down. Rarely gives test reviews..tests are HARD, written answers. Waits until end of class to give test grades back (if she even has them ready). Treats the class like they are 3rd graders. If you ask her about grades or attendance she says &quot;come to my office&quot; won't give thru email.
                
                   she reads through her power point slides and makes students copy from the slides. thats it! dont ask questions coz she would say, &quot; i dont know. i will have to look that up.&quot; end of discussion! terrible!
                
                   Does not know how to teach a freshman course. treats everyone as if they were Env. Sci majors.
                
                   needs to go back and learn how to teach studnets
                
                   needs to learn how to teach to students level-tests are insane-avoid if possible
                
                   horrible class
                
                   MRS. K IS A VERY NICE LIBERAL TEACHER BUT HER TEST ARE INSANE.  SHE XPECTS YOU TO MEMORIEZ LARGE QUANTITIES OF INFORMATION AND CONSIDERS THAT LEARNING&#63;&#63;&#63;&#63;  IN MY OPINION SHE SHOULD HAVE MORE TEST THAT COVER LESS INFO THAN CRAMING IT INTO MONSTER TEST. 100 NOTE CARDS PLUS.. THE HARDEST TEST AT TAMU-COMMERCE- WATCH OUT!
                
                   Easy class to sit in, she writes down everything you need to write down, so no thinking in class...BUT...her tests are the hardest ever!  you have to memorize the notes word for word in order to do well on the tests.  Nice lady, but VERY difficult exams.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst teacher I ever had.She never helps the students, if you ask her a question she refers you to her aid. She doesn't know anything about biology. Hardest mid term and final I ever had.If you have her drop. She likes to give sob stories about how bad her life is. Favors her husbands students.
                
                   If you need to take Lab dont she is the tuffist knockheaded person i have every delt with. It was suppose to be a 100 course she taught it as if it was a 400.. Poor woman has issues....
                
                   Whatever you do, do NOT have her for a lab teacher. Mid Term and Final are all fill in the blank. Very HARD! She does NOT teach!
                
                   Knows very little about Biology. Teaches nothing - expect the hardest Mid-Term and Final you will ever have unless you find out answers beforehand. Never gives enough time to complete work. Unreasonably hard to do well in her class.
                
                   Dr. Winemiller is a great prof! She has a lot of experience with the material so lecture is interesting.  Really have to work for your grade, but there are tools that can help. SI sessions are great! Even if you know the material, it's so helpful! The lab was the hardest part, but if you get a good instructor, you'll be fine. Loved this class!
                
                   Overall class not too bad. Lecture is really long and she does take attendance. Exams are very similar to notes. If you put in the work you can definitely make an A.
                
                   Great professor. All the info for her exams came straight from her lectures. I used the textbook as a read-along to her lecture notes. She gives bonus points during every other lecture that will boost you up to the next letter grade. It is very possible to get an A if you show up to class everyday and study in detail about a week before the exams.
                
                   LOVE her! She was super helpful, especially in her office hours. Super approachable. Her tests are multiple choice & mostly contain application questions. I don't really like science classes, but her class was amazing. There is a lab with the class that can really help your grade. 
                
                   I liked Dr. Winemiller. Her lectures are very clear, but sit near the front because she talks quiet. She gives extra credit points through TopHat. There are 4 tests, and they are hard but reasonable and based totally on the lectures. Remember that there is a lab with this class, which can be hard.
                
                   There's only 4 grades for the actual lecture class which all 4 are tests. Her lectures are awesome because she incorporates personal stories and photographs. Attending class is a must and she gives bonus points through TopHat. Her tests are pretty straight forward if you know the material well. 
                
                   Her lectures are tough, but Dr. Winemiller makes sure everyone understands. The lectures are necessary to pass the class. She doesn't teach directly from the book and her test come from what you cover in lecture and the corresponding lab. She is a great lecturer and shares a few personal experiences which makes her relatable. 
                
                   Dr. Winemiller tries to keep the class very light, but of course there is reading involved. It's mainly stuff I learned all throughout high school and jr. high. She is definitely there if you have any questions. NEVER MISS LAB. EVER. She is great at giving visual representations of whatever it is we are going over in class. She cares about us. 
                
                   Lectures sometimes drag but overall she's a very good teacher and makes hard information easy to understand. Her tests are very detailed and require a lot of studying but if you memorize everything you can do well. 
                
                   The test are very hard. Requires a lot of memorizing. Great professor who cares about her students!  
                
                   lectures are interesting, and theres no homework, but tests are difficult
                
                   Dr. Winemiller was a wonderful professor. She provided informational power-points and lectures which she seemed to base her tests off of. She gives a lot of extra credit and will help you if you ask. I hardly used that book, but as long as you go to class and take notes it is easy to earn at least a B. 
                
                   Great professor! Her lectures are interesting and the information is pretty easy to understand. Her tests do require a lot of studying though. No homework and there are bonus points throughout the semester. She is very approachable and truly cares about how her students are doing in the class.
                
                   Really great Professor! Reading is absolutely MANDATORY though to make anything higher than a C. But the textbook chapters are full of pictures and only about 20 pages long. She gives bonus points for attending class and answering questions
                
                   Dr. Winemiller is EXCELLENT. The best professor I have had at Texas A&M. She really cares about her students and is very knowledgeable with the material. She is always available for help and the concepts are not only fairly easy but really interesting. The book is a great help but if you just study her lecture notes you can get a good grade.
                
                   Super beawesoming professor. Very clear in her teaching and explanation, and her exam reviews are there to prep you to excel. Even if you're just looking for a class to satisfy your science requirement, I highly recommend Dr. Winemiller's class, not only its fun, its very interesting. You'll love her and the value she carries and an educator.
                
                   She is very nice and extremely interested in her subject! She gives clicker points in class for attendance and short quizzes, which are very easy. Her tests are fair, and are reflective of the notes she gives in class. I never read the book unless I needed clarification on something. I definitely recommend Zoology!
                
                   Dr. Winemiller is such a great prof! she really loves what she is talking about and actually cares how well her students do! you will make an A if you study! take zoology!
                
                   Dr. Versaw was really good at giving feedback and was always ready to answer any questions. However, his lectures were often confusing and very, very long. There wasn't much interaction in the classroom, so it was difficult to stay focused at times. Tests were tough if you don't read. Nice professor, but attendance didn't make a difference for me.
                
                   Well Dr. Versaw works with an other professor Dr. Hardin and out of both of them Dr. Versaw is way better in my perpective. During the lectures, he asks questions to make sure you undersatnd the concept.  He would rather go over the topic again if you ask. Dr. Versaw's exams are easy. Dr. Hardin not so much.  You have to study and read!!
                
                   I think Versaw, is a cinnamon role, and really cares for his students. He co-teaches with Hardin  and let me tell you, Hardin is very... not good. He brings in terms that he doesn't explain, and is very unclear and boring to listen to. Dr. Versaw was an excellent teacher and I wish he would teach the entire BIOL111 class
                
                   Versaw is unfortunate very difficult to understand. He strays from topic quite a bit, making it hard to recognize whether he is trying to present an example or something else. He is entirely unhelpful when you ask questions as he yet again, doesn't actually tell you what is right or wrong. 0/10 would recommend. Was a straight A student until this. 
                
                   Good luck getting through his course and earning an A! He uses confusing terminology when it isn't needed, and is very belittling when asked a question. Would not recommend. 
                
                   I took BIOL 111 from Versaw when it was team-taught with Hardin. Versaw was terrible. I went to his office hours to get some tips on how to improve/be more successful and he told me he didn't care about students passing his class and if it was up to him he wouldn't curve and would fail everyone. A boring, indifferent professor. Avoid.
                
                   Versaw had a great personality! He was friendly and made lectures fun. However, don't mistake his personality for his exams. Just study ad make sure you are prepared for lectures! 
                
                   I read, went to tutoring, attended every lecture and still made a D. Tests are ridiculous. He says he wants everyone to make an A, good luck making a C.
                
                   Dr. Versaw was very knowledgable about the material, but was VERY confusing. He is very monotone and speaks softly. Halfway through the semester he switches with another professor which I didn't like at all. There was no extra credit, and tests were extremely difficult. I went to tutoring 10 + hours a week, and averaged between 60-70 on exams. BAD!
                
                   This class was the worst academic experience I have ever had.  Do not even think that you will have a chance of passing without going to outside tutoring.  I was able to raise my next test by 30 points after starting tutoring, but that was the only test I passed the entire semester.  The final was the hardest test ever.  All profs offered are bad 
                
                   This class was incredibly difficult no matter how much you read or studied. Versaw was hard to hear in class and was quite boring. He switches in the middle of the semester with another prof which made the class even more difficult as they have very different teaching styles. If you take the class be prepared to study non stop.... 
                
                   Dr. Versaw and Dr. Hardin don't teach the material well enough for how difficult the tests are.  Going to lecture doesn't help, you're gonna have to read and dissect the book anyways.  They are both very knowledgable about Bio--but they are super monotone and can be confusing.  Unfortunately, BIOL 111 is a tough class no matter what prof you get. 
                
                   The tests are extremely hard and there are no chances for extra credit.  His lectures drag, he speaks very quiet and he is very boring.  Would not take him again.
                
                   I failed every single one of his tests, even after attending every class and reading the text book
                
                   Very monotoned and reads straight off of powerpoints. Definitely have to read the book as he considers everything fair game. Helpful in office hours however he can sometimes be confusing. He's a very nice guy but be prepared for quality time with the good 'ol textbook!
                
                   Professor Versaw taught with another professor, switching halfway through the semester. Both professors had a monotonous voice and I found their teaching styles very unengaging, lackluster, and almost pointless. Despite my endless efforts and hours of studying, I only passed one of the four tests given during the semester.
                
                   I didn't find him very helpful. He switched halfway through the semester with another prof, that was frustrating. I heard he does that every year. He stays through the fist two tests then Hardin finishes the semester. Versaw included moles on his tests which is chemistry, he put them on very test until there is 100% success rate, which is never.
                
                   This class was really uninteresting. He had a very monotonous voice, that was terrible for an 8am. Although he did answer every question that was presented to him during lecture, he would sometimes sound very degrading. I wouldn't take a class from this teacher ever again.
                
                   his class was SO hard! i studied for hours from the book and still have failed almost every test.
                
                   simple course... take it seriously though. form a study group.
                
                   You don't need to come to class because all he does is show you the pictures from the book. For test his notes for you to study are the pictures from the book and he does not tell you what you need to know just says study the pictures and the tests do not have pictures on them. You never know specific the questions will be on each picture.
                
                   He sucks. He's boring, basically reads from the book diagrams. We were so behind that the SI leader had to teach 2 chapters. Read the book and go to the SI's.
                
                   SUCKS!! He is a horrible prof.
                
                   Rizzo was pretty wacky, which made for some interesting classes, but you need to make sure you completely understand the material for the tests and sometimes he just doesn't explain it well enough. Use the SI's!
                
                   Sucked! The class really, not him. He seemed liked he was willing to help and would answer any questions you had in class but it just made no sense. You looked at transparencies all class period and the tests were...well...just plain hard.
                
                   I love him..he's awesome!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   this guy is ridiculous. tests dont make ANY logical sence.. good luck unless u have the old tests.. and he changed them up completely for my class.. so we all got screwed .. AWESOME! not
                
                   very straight forward. takes questions off of previous years tests and the final is mostly question off hte last 3 tests.
                
                   4 tests, very comprehensional, great personality and willing to help. must study.
                
                   The awesome thing about his professor is that all the exams are take home, so you can work in big groups! However,it is all short answer and he can be a bit picky about wording.
                
                   tough but rewarding class. One of the best biology courses i've taken here. i think i can speak for everyone when i say that he cares about his students and the material. plus his son is really cute. A+
                
                   Hand down the best professor I have ever had. Knows his material and is very helpful. Exams are difficult but going to the lecture helps.
                
                   Hands down the best professor I have ever had. Knows his material and very helpful to students. Exams are difficult but going to the lecture helps.
                
                   A professor that has a lifetime influence on his students - responsible for more successful physicians and scientists than any other faculty member on campus.
                
                   She wasnt hard but the fact that the class was paired with her husband who doesnt know how to teach was awful. For her alone just study her notes ALOT the lab will almost kill you. 
                
                   Dr. Lints was an amazing professor. She wrote notes in lecture and everything on the tests were exactly from the notes so that means you have to go to class. I took her half a semester and took Dr. Mcknight first half of the semester. His part of the semester was really hard. All he put up was pictures and he expected us to know it all from them.
                
                   I loved Dr. Lints! She writes out notes every so often during lecture and her test questions are almost all from those. She has a New Zealand accent so some words she says different, but overall easy to understand. Very clear professor. Only grades are the exams so STUDY! Had to drop the course because of the LAB, not the lecture.
                
                   Dr. Lints is probably my favorite professor at A&M so far. She writes notes for you in class, so literally all you have to do is copy. She's super sweet and super approachable. While everyone else is complaining about 112, you'll be cruising along as she essentially spoon-feeds you the material in the simplest and most comprehensible way.
                
                   Lints is an extremely easy-to-follow and nice professor. She basically write the notes for you, and all you have to do is copy them down. The tests are straight from the notes. She even gives away some of the test questions in here optional homework assignments. If you miss a class she is always happy to provide you with the notes from that day.
                
                   Super easy professor. She takes notes in class and all you have to do is literally copy what she writes down. Her questions are straight from her notes; there isn't any need for a textbook. I never opened the book once and am expecting an A in the class. Would definitely recommend to anyone. She's sweet, interesting, and knows her stuff.
                
                   I couldn't stand going to Lints' class. I found her super dry and boring and had a hard time focusing. She talks in a very quiet monotone voice. However, since she didn't base her class on the order in the book, I went to class so that I could base my reading notes off what she wanted to be read. I wouldn't recommend.
                
                   Her tests are straight from her notes. As long as you go to class and take good notes, you should do fine on her tests. She really doesn't go by the book which makes it easier. Try and sit towards the front though, she can write a bit small sometimes.
                
                   Great Professor! Very clear in her notes , takes time to make sure students could copy them down. Reviews the material from the previous lecture during the first part of the next class. Posts practice quizzes online, some of the questions in the quizzes are word for word on the test. Videos and diagrams were engaging and helpful.
                
                   Tests could be difficult.  However, she was pretty nice.  The class was extremely boring since she and her husband would just quickly cycle through PowerPoint slides as they talked at the front of the class.  She was even less engaging than her husband. (Thierry taught during the first half of the semester.  Robyn taught the second half.)
                
                   Dr. Jones was personable but not the world's most gifted teacher.  It took a lot of work on my own to understand some of the biostats concepts in his half of the semester.  His tests were all MC but hard and sometimes confusingly worded.  But yay pipefish!
                
                   Dr. Grenbaum is tough, but cares, I had a C, but he still wrote a rec. letter for a zoo internship AFTER discouraging me! He may not subscribe to the "everyone deserves a trophy" philosophy, but cares for any student that shows intellect and dedication.  After 19 years in the zooeducation fields, I'd sit in on a lecture anytime!
                
                   Dr. Greenbaum teaches as if all his students are going to be chordate anatomy specialists so he gives a lot of information but his tests are very general. This makes it hard to study because there is a ton of material but only get tested on parts of it. The lab portion also presents a lot of material that could make it a separate class.
                
                   Very painful class, if you are taking this class as an elective and are not specifically obsessed with detailed evolutionary concepts or it is your major I would not suggest the class. I unknowingly thought it would be a somewhat simplistic class when signing up for it and it turned out to be miserably time consuming.
                
                   Teaches what's on the exam, but fails you if your answers aren't completely perfect. Very condescending and insults the class after a test, as the failure rate is very high (75% F average on tests). Will also insult you personally if you go into his office for help. Attempts to disprove religious beliefs during lectures.
                
                   Exam averages were terrible, no curve, and he is not clear on lectures at all. Spent too much time answering unrelated questions from others and he rushed through important material. His 'think-pair-share" activities were useless, and made me anxious. Friends and I had to drop, it was disappointing. 
                
                   This has been the only class I have ever dropped at this institution. He taught this class alongside another professor who was about the same as him. Exams were TOUGH and no matter how long I studied I still made poor grades. I studied hard, and I've never felt more disappointed with any class--I would advice anyone against taking BIO 213 with him.
                
                   Dr. Ericksons tests were all extremely difficult written response exams. The class averages for the tests were usually in the low sixties. Hard work does not pay off in his class. Dr. Erickson is much more concerned with his personal research and academic ego than he is at helping students learn molecular biology.
                
                   Nice guy but his exams are extremely hard.  His whole exam questions are all short answered and very difficult.
                
                   He was an extremely nice teacher and was very concerned with his students grades. The only problem is that his test are ridiculously HARD! I would study about 8-10 hours for a test and still wouldn't make the grade I wanted. Great person, but not the greatest professor.
                
                   She's extremely rude and likes to humiliate students as a "teaching" method. Yells at you for minor things in front of the class. She lacks passion for teaching biology and is very uninspiring.  If anything, my interest in micro diminished after this class. There is no explaining your point with her, she just shuts you down. Miserable experience. 
                
                   Dr. Cohn is a great professor. He really knows what he is talking about and puts everything into terms easiest for students to understand. Attendance is not mandatory but absolutely recommended. The exams are much more manageable if you go to class and hear what he has to say about the topic. Lab is the worst part. Extremely difficult.
                
                   I love the topic of anatomy. I am disappointed to get a C in this class because I enjoyed learning the subject. You have to devote much time and effort in this class. Cohn is good at teaching what he knows. Sometimes his lectures are just rambles. It is so easy not to go to class (which is what I did)... GO TO LECTURE. You'll make it through.
                
                   Dr. Cohn was a really nice guy.. I have to take him again because I ended up dropping the class.. Dreading already taking the class. Honestly I wish there was another professor I could choose. Lab is extremely difficult and you must study every day. I was super excited for this class! Not so excited about anatomy anymore..
                
                   The lab is the hardest part of the class with all of the memorization.  The lecture tests are what can really bring up your grade in the end.  You should record his lectures because he expects you to know every single word he said for the exams. 
                
                   Cohn is hilarious. He's quirky, smart, and a mess.  I love it.  Lecture is pretty easy to do well, lab on the other hand is death.  Study for lab till your eyeballs come off.  Didn't get an "A" because of Lab. 
                
                   His lectures were long and boring. I found them really hard to follow because they were so dull. Lab was absolutely terrible and ridiculous. There was a ton of memorization and stress, since the lab was 50% of the grade. I'm talking about memorizing over a hundred things in one week. I hated my life taking this class. 
                
                   Cohn is a good prof. His voice is monotone. Exams aren't bad if you study. But you have to study. He goes off on tangents a lot. The Lab is what you have to worry about. It is one of the hardest things I have ever done. Don't kid yourself, you HAVE to study a week in advance for the quizzes. Seriously. Study. A lot.
                
                   He was great although sometimes his analogies can get confusing... tests weren't bad at all but lab will kick your butt like no lab you've ever experienced. Im an A average student and I struggled to pull my grade up to a B.
                
                   If you're a patient person, then he's a great teacher. But he tends to babble a lot... But his ridiculous examples and stories help make sense of the material! Oh, and don't doubt the lab TA when they tell you to start studying for lab a week before!! Lab requires a TON of work.
                
                   lecture is pretty easy, the lab requires  A LOT of work!
                
                   If you read the book and use her PowerPoints to study, this class is super easy. Her lectures can be a little confusing though. I had a hard time following what she was talking about sometimes.
                
                   Dr. Bohn Is Amazing! She is funny, engaging and knowledgeable. She stimulates the student's interest and even shared with us some of her (awesome) research. I loved her course, even though it was her first time at FIU, she is among my favorite professors. She is not an easy A, you will have to read and prepare, but the exams are fair. TAKE HER!
                
                   All she did was read her powerpoints word-for-word during lecture, and she posted these online so there was no point in attending class...and her tests were ridiculous..made a B in the class but that was undoubtedly a miracle ha
                
                   Read exactly from her slides and made it seem really easy but her tests were hard and she would ask questions from graphs she told you not to memorize.
                
                   
                
                   Again why is she teaching here? Her lectures are OKAY but her midterms are just HARD. DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS if you are not a bio major. 
                
                   The class average on midterms is 55%. Although she posts exactly what you need to know in the lecture. She posts all her lecture. She gives out study guides and truly wants students to understand the topic. If you take the time and put the effort into the class you will definitely pass. I got a 85 on the last exam and it felt like a quiz not a exam
                
                   Her tests are hard but we got to remember we are now in college. Her lectures are clear and is willing to answer questions. It is true she does say she doesn't know on some topics, but then again she is a biology teacher meaning its generic, not specifically one side of Bio. Learn to read, comprehend, and attend lectures, her midterm wasn't too bad
                
                   By far the worst teacher ever hired at UC Merced! Lecture slides are USELESS. She always has an excuse to not answer questions, such as "I'm not a microbiologist" or "I'm not too sure about that" and gives a I do not know as an answer! UC Merced please get rid of this teacher, she is like Andy Liwang when it comes to exams except she cannot teach! 
                
                   Just took her midterm and it is ridiculous. It is an intro biology course for students to learn the basics of biology and she treats you as if you should already know what everything is. The test are so specific as well. She needs to know who her audience is.
                
                   Her class is hard and I don't mind working hard to earn a good grade. She's just a really bad professor. Doesn't explain where to find her homework assignments online and lectures are just summaries of the textbook reading, which you still need to do, so why bother listening?
                
                   Take her for Biology. She goes fast but explains the material very well. Also, SI sessions were very helpful. You have to read the textbook though in order to make a good grade. She also gives a good amount of extra credit.
                
                   This class is difficult. Beaster-Jones moves faster than other professors, and our class was four chapters ahead of other classes at one point. However, it is helpful to be ahead because you already know what is going to be discussed in lab.
                
                   Reading the textbook isn't really a must if you attend lecture and take really good notes.
                
                   The class requires a lot of studying. Reading the textbook is a must, but she is a good teacher. You can tell she really enjoys it. I would recommend her!
                
                   She is a great professor! She is excited about biology even though sometimes class is still a little boring. Its still a hard class though so it requires a lot of studying.
                
                   Her tests were very wordy and lectures were boring.
                
                   Good prof. Class is graded on 3 tests, 1 weighted final and lab. She covers less material than other bio profs but gets much more into detail in lectures and exams. Her exams are difficult, but not impossible. I would recommend taking her class
                
                   Dr. Wright is great. He has a dry sense of humor that is sometimes interpreted as mean. He makes students figure things out for themselves. This way of teaching has really pushed me to understand biometry, instead of just regurgitating equations. His classes are very basic, so you can truly understand each concept, instead of brushing past things.
                
                   He is a difficult person to deal with. Not willing to help you at all. Does not explain well.Does not have office hours, is hard to find and does not have set dates for exams.
                
                   Very old, needs to retire. Terrible prof, will never take a class of his again. Does not prepare you for tests and is not willing to help you after class
                
                   Dr. Sissom is very nice. But, it's hard to focus on what he's saying in class because his voice is monotone and quite. Reading book is unnecessary. You just need to study the outline. The tests focus on details and strict you on words. You should understand well the material. Going to SI class is useful sometimes. If you really study, you can get A
                
                   Definitely one of the harder upper level classes I've taken, but highly informative and fun to learn with him at times. Voice can be low and droning (easy to fall asleep to), but he's strongly passionate about the things he teaches and helpfully hands on in the field. Always willing to help, too! Tests are TOUGH.
                
                   Lectures truly do not make any sense and it's hard to stay awake when he is talking. The PowerPoint slides can be confusing and you better know the tiny details for each test. Tests are extremely difficult to pass.
                
                   Really great teacher. You do have to study for your exams and labs. Doesn't curve test much and no homework. Don't need a text book, just print out the lecture outlines and study those.
                
                   Tough tests, but I have learned so much in this class and am loving it! 
                
                   He loves the subjects he teaches! His tests are easy if you study thoroughly. His upper level classes are more difficult and you have to know a LOT of information for each test. I feel like my tuition money was well spent. I learned more in his classes than I have learned with any other professor. Nice, personable guy that will actually teach and not just lecture. However, he can be pretty scatterbrained. Overall a very good professor!
                
                   This class is so easy is you take good notes and pay attention. He makes sure everything is clear before going on, and encourages questions if you don't understand. Textbook is good for the diagrams and going over anything you might have problems with.
                
                   Dr. Sissom is a really nice guy, he is SUPER interested in the course topics so he talks a lot. There is a TON of info that you have to study a lot. Tests are very similar to past years tests. GO TO SI! it is the reason i passed.
                
                   Class was helpful. Studying is a MUST! His test from previous years are helpful for your current semester. I opened the book a total of 3 times the whole semester (to look at diagrams). Bottom line: Go to class, take notes, study & you will do fine.
                
                   A lot of notes for the class but he gives you the outlines. He is very interested in Zoology and is a great guy but there is a lot of information for each test. You have to study a lot for this class. It's not a blow off class.
                
                   Zoology. He is very easy to talk to and a very nice person. His area of expertise is scorpions and parasites, so the course is geared toward those topics. Not much on higher forms of life, unfortunately (Only a couple minutes on vertebrates on the last day of lecture)
                
                   the class is not bad but he picks the tiniest details that are not at all important to put on his tests, and there is a ton of material to learn for each test.
                
                   Overload of information
                
                   His class gets very boring and there are tons of notes for the tests. It is a ridiculous amount to study for one test because he can only ask so many questions. But, he is a nice, personable guy.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   With all due respect, she has got to be the sorriest teacher I've ever had. I do hope it is a result of her illness. I'd hate to think a well person could be this sorry.
                
                   Overall, the class would be good if she wasnt sick.  Since she is sick, she does not teach at all, she is never available, and never answers any emails.  She is very rude to students and often makes lousy excuses for not having things done.  We went 4 weeks without getting our test grades back causing us to miss the drop date.
                
                   This class is perfect if you don't want something hard, you're not a science major, and you have a basic understanding of biology. I felt like I was retaking my high school freshman Bio class. She is very interesting. As long as you go to most classes and pay attention and read through notes you'll be just fine.
                
                   I took Biology for nonmajors and it was an easy class! Dr. Lockman is great at explaining things and prepares you well for the tests. All the notes and worksheets are online, but she often takes attendance. She is super nice as long as you don't talk during class.
                
                   I took her for Cell Biology... She covers interesting information but you need to learn it alone since she just reads slides and goes way too fast. She twitches all the time so get used to that, and she is a busy work FREAK. I havent done that much busy work since I was in elementary school.
                
                   Good teacher. Really nice. I have no real interest in science, but she made the class relatively easy. Lectures were good (I just had trouble paying attention because of my complete lack of interest in biology). She prepares great notes and worksheets that help tremendously when studying for tests. I would reccomend this class.
                
                   Great professor, not too hard, not too easy. Plus she is very very attractive
                
                   I had Dr.Lockman for pharmacology special topics class and it was ridiculous...she teaches way too fast and if you have no advance courses in biology you will be lost...the tests were somewhat fair, but to specific...I hardly went to class cause could not stay awake but still got a 98 average...learn the material before hand
                
                   He isn't very bright, very mean spirited, nasty temper, incredible ego, micromanager, ...  SHSU was stupid enough to hire him.  Now we can add WTAMU to that list of shame.  Good luck with one of the worst administrators ever!
                